Suncor Energy (SU) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Suncor Energy (SU) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptJul.27.17 | About: Suncor Energy (SU) Suncor Energy, Inc. (NYSE:SU)
Q2 2017 Earnings Call
July 27, 2017 9:30 am ET
Executives
Stephen Douglas - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Analysts
Greg Pardy - RBC Dominion Securities, Inc.
Neil Mehta - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Roger D. Read - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Frank McGann - Bank of American Merrill Lynch
Travis Wood - National Bank Financial
Dan Healing - The Canadian Press
Jeff Lewis - The Globe & Mail, Inc.
Nia Williams - Reuters
Operator
Good morning ladies and gentlemen, and welcome to the Suncor Energy Second Quarter 2017 Financial Results Call and Webcast. At this time all participants are in a listen-only mode, later we will conduct a question and answer session and instructions will follow at that time. As a reminder this conference is being recorded.
I would now like to turn the call over to Mr. Steve Douglas, Vice President, Investor Relations. Mr. Douglas, please go ahead.
Stephen Douglas - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Thank you Michelle and good morning to everyone. Welcome to the Suncor Energy second quarter earnings call. With me here in Calgary this morning are Steve Williams, our President and CEO; along with Alister Cowan, our EVP and Chief Financial Officer.
I'd ask you to note that today's comments contain forward-looking information that our actual results may differ materially from expected results because of various risk factors and assumptions described in our second quarter earnings release, as well as our current AIF. And both of these are available on SEDAR, EDGAR and our website, suncor.com.
Certain financial measures that we refer to in these comments are not prescribed by Canadian GAAP, for description of these financial measures, again see our second quarter earnings release.
Following our formal remarks, we will open the call to questions, first from members of the investment community, and then if time permits, members of the media.
With that, I'll ask Steve Williams for his comments.
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Thanks Steve, and good morning and thank you to everyone on the line for joining us. I think it's important right up front to acknowledge that our second quarter results were somewhat mixed both from an operational and a business environment perspective. The past few months of (1:55) the combination of falling crude price and a strengthening Canadian dollar, and these trends and continued volatility I think simply underline the importance of concentrating our efforts on those things which we can control. In Suncor's cash that means a continued focus on disciplined cost management, and of course capital allocation, and those two add up to what we call operational excellence.
On the positive side, I'm very pleased with our continued success in taking cost out of the business, we're steadily moving the entire company towards a sustainably lower cost base that's positioning us to be globally competitive. At the same time, we continue to exercise capital discipline, while executing on our growth programs, buying back shares and maintaining a strong balance sheet.
Our downstream and offshore business delivered strong operational and financial results. However, as I said, I'm not satisfied with the operational performance of our Oil Sands assets in the second quarter. The first major maintenance turnaround at Firebag units three and four, after five years of operation, encountered a number of challenges resulted in a significantly slower restart and ramp-up than expected.
And at Syncrude, the planned April turnaround was advanced use of fire and a plight wreck (3:31) in March and then had to be extended as a result of repairs associated with the fire as well as several other more minor operational issues. Syncrude also advanced coker maintenance originally planned for this fall in order to take advantage of the downtime.

So the end result was lower Oil Sands production than we had planned for in the quarter. However, it's worth saying that I am confident that the earnings from these events will assist us in better understanding these assets going forward. And we are planning for a return to strong reliable production throughout the second half of the year.
It's important to note that even in the quarter, where our Oil Sands production fell short of plan and average oil prices were below expectations, Suncor still generated funds from operations of over CAD 1.6 billion. And this just demonstrates once again what a powerful cash generation gene (4:34) the Suncor integrated model is.
So, let's get into the details of our second quarter. At Oil Sands, we produced a total of just over 350,000 barrels a day, including 290,000 barrels a day of upgraded product. We completed major plant maintenance activities at Firebag and the Unit 2 upgrader, and held our cash cost to just CAD 27.80 per barrel, and that's the lowest second quarter Oil Sands cash costs in over a decade.
With the bulk of our Oil Sands maintenance for the year now complete, our Oil Sands operations have been running at full rates in July. We expect our production guidance for the – we expect to meet our production guidance for the year, and have actually lowered our cash cost guidance to CAD 23 to CAD 26 per barrel, thanks to our strong year-to-date performance.
At Syncrude, planned and unplanned outages reduced Suncor share of production by over 100,000 barrels a day in the quarter. And once again this performance is not acceptable. I remain confident that we can achieve the long-term operational goals we have set. We always knew that the road to operational excellence would not be a straight line, and that there will be some setbacks like what we experienced in the quarter.
However, we will continue to work closely with Syncrude and other owners to execute on a plan that expect will drive utilization rates above 90% and cash cost below 30% – below US$30 per barrel by 2020. So those are original commitments we're confident in.
In E&P, we continue to see excellent performance in the second quarter. Our total, offshore production year-to-date is tracking 4% ahead of last year. At the same time, cash operating costs have come down to 22% with average operating costs year-to-date on the East Coast below CAD 10 per barrel. And in the North Sea well below CAD 5 per barrel. And remember, of course, those are Canadian dollars. So as a result of this strong performance, we've raised our 2017 production guidance for E&P twice this year, by a total of 20,000 barrels per day.
In the downstream, our Refining and Marketing business turned in another excellent quarter. Utilization rates, our refineries rose to 94%, which drove a 10% increase in production and a 6% drop in unit operating expense versus Q2 of last year.
The increased production supported strong retail sales and set a Suncor record for the first half of the year. So despite market concerns around gasoline demand, our downstream business is squarely on track to deliver another year of strong earnings and cash flows.
Turning to our growth projects. It's an exciting time at Fort Hills and Hebron, as they rapidly approach first oil. Our focus is increasingly on commissioning, startup, and operations as we move into the last few months of construction. At Fort Hills, we've been tracking to the previously announced budget and schedule, the mining, ore operation, major site infrastructure, and primary extraction assets have all been handed over to operations, and the turn-over of utilities is now in progress.
Just two weeks ago, the East Tank Farm, which will support the Fort Hills operation, was commissioned and declared ready for service. That just leaves a secondary extraction, the paraffinic froth treatment, as the final area where construction activities are currently concentrated.

We recently identified some opportunities to accelerate the construction schedule in order to take best advantage of productivity and further de-risk the full plant startup. This would result in some capital spending originally scheduled for 2018 being brought into 2017. And accordingly, you'll have noted we have adjusted our guidance, and Alister will go into the details a bit later on the call.
Now remember that we're proceeding with phase commissioning and startup plan that will see the front-end of the plant, including the water assets, fully tested prior to the onset of cold winter weather. This allows for early identification and resolution of any issues that may arise. And as a result, we expect to significantly de-risk the production of first oil late in 2017.
Approximately 85% of personnel have been hired – of operating personnel have been hired, including all critical frontline positions. Training activities are well advanced, and we have greatly benefited from attracting experienced staff in the PFT process.
There has been one recent development on the Fort Hills project that is a little disappointing. Our partner Total has chosen not to approve or provide additional project sanction funding for the Fort Hills project, and as a result, we are now in the early stages of a commercial dispute with Total. Given the fact that construction is now 92% as of the end of July, we're not anticipating that this issue will impact the plan to achieve first oil by the end of the year.
Our major growth – our other major growth project is of course Hebron, off the East Coast of Canada. During the second quarter, the Hebron platform was successfully towed back to its offshore location and safely positioned on the sea floor. Drilling operations commenced just last week, and the project remains well on track to produce first oil by the end of this year, as planned.
So with all operations back up and running, and our major growth project expected to deliver first oil by year end, we're well set for a strong second half to 2017.
Perhaps the one other thing that seems most top of mind to investors is the M&A climate, in light of recent transactions in the sector, and the much lower – for much longer (12:04) environment.
What I would say is that, beginning over five years ago, Suncor has maintained a strong balance sheet. And as you've seen, we treat this as a strategic asset. We generate discretionary free cash flow that is after sustaining capital and dividend above a US$40 WTI price.
And we allocate that cash in a disciplined manner with a focus on returns between organic growth, M&A and share buybacks. So as you look to the future, judge us by what we've done in the past. We will continue to make disciplined choices, always targeting the best returns for shareholders.
So, with that, I'll turn over to our Chief Financial Officer, Alister Cowan to go into some more detail on our financial performance.
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Thanks, Steve. And as Steve mentioned earlier in the call, in the second quarter we saw average benchmark crude prices fall by about US$3.50, and towards the end of the quarter we saw the Canadian dollar strengthened sharply against U.S. dollar.
Nevertheless, we did produce solid financial results once again. We generated as Steve said over CAD 1.6 billion in funds from operations, approximately CAD 200 million in operating earnings.
Notably, our E&P business produced well above expectations and generated approximately CAD 440 million in funds flow. And our Refining and Marketing delivered over CAD 500 million of funds flow, despite a negative FIFO impact as a result of falling crude prices.
This is very consistent with last year's strong second quarter in R&M, after adjusting for (14:04) and the lubricants sale, which was completed in the first quarter of this year.

Our funds from operations for the quarter more than covered our sustaining capital spending of CAD 891 million and our dividends of approximately CAD 530 million leaving almost CAD 200 million in discretionary free cash flow.
Over the last 12 months, we have generated over CAD 3.6 billion in discretionary free cash flow, and as Steve said, after sustaining capital underpinned of the dividend. A key contributor to the free cash flow generation is our continued success in reducing costs across the business.
Now everyone's aware of the steady reduction in our Oil Sands cash costs in the past few years, and that's certainly a very considerable accomplishment. But I just wanted to emphasize, it's not only in our Oil Sands operations that we're improving productivity and driving our cost, right across the company we've been steadily streamlining business processes, eliminating non-value added work and increasing productivity.
In the first half of 2017, our total operating selling and general expenses were more than 10% lower than the first half of 2014. And at the same time, our total production increased by almost 19%. The result is you're seeing as lower breakeven cost and increase cash flow.
On the capital front, we've invested close to CAD 1.7 billion in the second quarter, bringing our year-to-date total growth and sustained capital spend to almost CAD 2.9 billion.
Progress on Fort Hills project accelerated during the quarter, and we now see the potential to advance work that was planned for early 2018 into this year. Accordingly, we've increased the capital spending guidance range for 2017 to CAD 5.4 billion to CAD 5.6 billion.
Now, to be honest, we've had some concerns about this, but let me assure you that this is simply an adjustment in the timing of the spend. The 2018 capital budget will be reduced (16:15) with the increase in this year's spend.
Our balance sheet continues to be a key strength for Suncor. We finished the quarter with approximately CAD 2.4 billion in cash and over CAD 8 billion of liquidity. During the quarter, we repaid US$1.25 billion of long-term debt. Our net debt to cash flow decreased to less than two times, and our debt to capitalization fell to approximately 27%, both within their target ranges. We expect debt levels to continue to decline organically as our production and cash flow increase moving forward.
On our last call, we've announced the initiation of a CAD 2 billion one year share buyback program, which we commenced on May 1. We've been aggressively executing on the program for almost three months now, to give you a bit of an update as of today we have repurchased and canceled over 11 million shares for approximately CAD 450 million. So we have been quite aggressive in July on this program.
The buyback program was (17:28) in the low US$50 range with funds coming from our discretion free cash flow. Now, as everyone is aware, the oil prices fell during the quarter and while the short-term trend and those oil prices have not influenced us to repurchases, we do believe it's prudent to flex the program based on the discretionary free cash flow in light of the current business environment.
Irrespective of oil prices, you can expect Suncor to continue its focus on reducing costs, carefully allocating our capital and following (18:01) competitive returns for our shareholders.
And I'm now going to pass it back to Steve Douglas.
Stephen Douglas - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Well, thank you, Alister and Steve. Just a few things to note before we go to the questions. There was a falling crude prices, as Alister noted, and so there was a FIFO expense of CAD 38 million after-tax. And that brings year-to-date to very close to zero, a CAD 5 billion positive year-to-date. Our stock-based compensation during the quarter was an after-tax expense of CAD 19 million, bringing the year-to-date total to CAD 91 million after-tax. And the FX impact was actually a CAD 278 million gain in the second quarter, bringing us to a CAD 381 million gain year-to-date.

There are, as Steve and Alister mentioned, a number of changes to our guidance. The updated guidance is available on our website, suncor.com. But a few of the highlights, we did, as mentioned increased the capital spending range up to CAD 5.4 billion to CAD 5.6 billion for the year, and we will be reducing our 2018 budget accordingly.
Due to strong performance and outlook, the E&P production range has been raised by a further 5,000 barrels per day. And as a result of the extended outage at Syncrude, the production range there has been lowered by the same amount, 5,000 barrels per day. So the net impact is no change to our 2017 production range of 680,000 to 720,000 barrels per day. The Suncor Oil Sands cash cost range has been reduced by CAD 1 to CAD 23 to CAD 26 per barrel, as a result of a strong year-to-date cost management and Syncrude cash costs have been increased to US$42 to US$45 a barrel, reflecting the impact of the extended outage.
Cash taxes have been increased by CAD 100 million, and that's primarily to reflect the higher cash taxes associated with increased North Sea production. And I should note that the range excludes the cash taxes associated with the lubricants and wind farms sales earlier this year.
There's also a number of small changes made to the business environment assumptions, and those are simply based on year-to-date actuals and expectations going forward.
With that, I'll turn it back to Michelle to take questions. Thank you.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Thank you. Our first question comes from the line of Greg Pardy with RBS (sic) [RBC] (21:19) Capital. Your line is open. Please go ahead.
Greg Pardy - RBC Dominion Securities, Inc.
Thanks. Thanks. Good morning. Steve, really just want to dig into a couple of areas not surprisingly, probably the Syncrude and Fort Hills, but maybe just before that, in terms of the capital increase that you've got this year, how much of that is related to call it the Syncrude repair work, and it sounds as though you'll be able to recover a bunch of that through insurance. Is that right?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah, I mean we haven't been explicit about the breakdown. But, yes, in excess of CAD 100 million has to do with the work at Syncrude, of which a large proportion of that is CapEx, and we would expect to get a recovery.
We can't be absolutely sure of the timing of the recovery. So, we've been prudent in the allowance. So, the CAD 500 million is the balance of Fort Hills and Syncrude. As Alister said, the Fort Hills piece is really just timing. We're still anticipating on Fort Hills that we will come in towards the top end of the range we guided on earlier in the year.
Greg Pardy - RBC Dominion Securities, Inc.
Okay great. And just with Syncrude. Can you touch maybe on just what's going right, what's going wrong, and just how you're thinking about the ramp-up coming into August?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah, I mean, first of all, perhaps it's worth just giving a snapshot of where we are operationally today, and I'll do it a little bit broader than just Syncrude. I mean Syncrude is already up at – between 70% and 80% of its nameplate capacity this morning. So, we're already exporting well in excess of 250,000 barrels a day, and (22:18) today. So, it's already in that 70% to 80% range.
(23:24) I am talking current operations, the base plant Firebag, MacKay River, are up at full throughputs, and have been for most of July. So, although I find the results unacceptable to me through the second quarter, they're very much back on target already in the third quarter.
But to get back to your comments, Greg. Overall, I'm not completely surprised by the Syncrude performance. We did talk about it not being a straight line. There would be – we have very good operation, and even when we had the good operation last year, I said we didn't build that in to expectations every day just yet. We are absolutely confident in the 90% and – to 90% utilization and a sub-CAD 30 a barrel in that 2020 time range. We are working those programs in detail, great work going on between ourselves, Imperial, Exxon, and Syncrude itself. And we will bring that and (24:33) we'll bring that out and show you that in a lot more detail.

It's also quite clear to us that the synergies are higher than we've anticipated, both in the day-to-day operation of the plant and the way we believe we will manage it going forward. But also in terms of those other synergies I talked about, how we connect the plant; how we can get – when we increase the utilization of these non-core base facilities, it was a how (25:08) we got security of bitumen supplies from three or four sources rather than one. We can do some of that with Syncrude by cross connecting some of the bitumen supplies.
You can keep the upgraders and export to market going longer by having connections on the product side between the players (25:27). So those projects are moving ahead with some pace now. So, I'm very comfortable in the long-term – disappointed, but not completely surprised in the short-term.
Greg Pardy - RBC Dominion Securities, Inc.
Thanks for that. And maybe just the last one is, you touched on the – just the commercial discipline (25:47) with Fort Hills. Can you – can you elaborate on that at all?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
I mean it's a little bit early. Literally, we're only a few days into the discussion, so it's too early for me to comment in detail on the dispute itself. What I would say is, the plant is 92% complete as of today. So we're really on the final stretches. Suncor and Teck remain completely aligned in our approach to the project, and I am not anticipating any impact on cost and schedule.
So, if anything, there is what we discussed today about the – because we get within (26:38) progress – very good progress on the project. So what we're planning to do is to finish off the bulk of it this year. What that means is, it positions us much better then for – no water introduction, through the winter will be done all pre-freezing season. And we'll be able to move into the startup with a high degree of confidence.
So the project itself, the brick and mortar piece of it, is in really good shape. We're still talking about the possibility of a first intermediate product sometime in September or October, and we're still talking about the first train up at the end of the year, and then progressively starting the other two trains up in the early part of next year, so that bodes very well for the ramp-up next year.
Greg Pardy - RBC Dominion Securities, Inc.
Thanks, Steve.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Neil Mehta with Goldman Sachs. Your line is open, please go ahead.
Neil Mehta - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Good morning guys. First question is related to the FX strength, the CAD-USD. And we recognize that you lowered the cost guidance here today as part of the release. Could you just talk about how that exchange rate change can – makes you think about the cost structure going forward? And I have a follow-up.
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah Neil, I mean, the change in the operating cost guidance we gave on the Oil Sands operations is really just – it's got nothing to do with the FX, it is all to do with us driving cost out of the business in a sustainable manner. I mean on the FX, with the pluses and minus, we take some negative impacts on the oil prices that translated back into Canadian dollars. But you saw the FX gain offsetting that as we translate our U.S. dollar debt. So, on a net-net basis, we manage it through the balance sheet. And so we don't typically go forward (28:54) hedge it. And we don't really see big of an impact on the equating (28:58) cost structure of the business.
Neil Mehta - Goldman Sachs & Co.
That's great. Second is the strengthen E&P has surprised us over the course of the year. Can you just talk about where you're seeing that strength, (29:11) elsewhere? And how sustainable is that going forward?

Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Hi, yeah, I mean we are very pleased with both the production and operating costs in that offshore business. And Neil, as you know it is a highly cash generative business. We have been investing albeit at not very material levels to Suncor, but we have been investing in a very selective targeted way, and we're starting to see the strong returns from those investments. So you will see us continue to do that. It's all of those if you like. So it is broadly across the operations. They've done exceedingly well.
And as we move towards the end of this year, you're going to see the ramp up of Hebron as well. So although it's not – it's a very important part of our business, we've always – I often get questions about the divestment of that business, and I said, we do see it as a part of our integrated business, it gives us some diversity, so when we see some trends in other parts, it's a very robust cash generator for us.
So, I'm pleased that strategy has been working and (30:36) we plan to continue it.
Neil Mehta - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Great. Last question for me is just around share repurchase, just going back to your comments Alister. It sounds like if I'm interpreting what you're saying is, if oil stays around US$50 a barrel, we should assume that you continue to execute the program, if it falls to the lower end of a range of call it US$45, you take your foot off the pedal a little bit, and if it goes above US$50, you get a little bit more aggressive. I might be putting words in your mouth, and I am trying to create a formula where there might not be one, but any comments there would be great?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
I mean, yeah, let me just do it from me if you like. You've heard Alister speak, but let me just give you a slightly different cut. I think you've nailed in a sense. I mean the flex we have in our capital allocation is, we are committed to our dividend. We have capital expenditure on organic stuff, which is starting to come to an end. But you know those programs are disciplined and executed over a period, and we tend not to slow down or speed those up.
So the piece of flexibility in our capital allocation is share buybacks and you know we've never given specific targets per se, but I think we were quite clear. We talked about CAD 2 billion in the range we were looking at, which was in that mid-50s type range. So you'll see us just be prudent and flex share buybacks up and down.
Neil Mehta - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Perfect. Thank you.
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
I would just add to that Neil, we have bought just under CAD 500 million of stock in the last three months, when our prices were in the sort of certainly at the (32:17) lower end of the range, but the flex is there and we will utilize it when we need to.
Neil Mehta - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Perfect. Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Roger Read with Wells Fargo. Your line is open. Please go ahead.
Roger D. Read - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Yeah. Thanks. Good morning.
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Good morning Roger.
Roger D. Read - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Hopefully. Okay. Good. Yeah. I just wanted to kind of come back on some of the OpEx questions, but maybe starting with Syncrude as you know you had the downtime planned you had the fire, as you've gone through the restart process and then work. Is this something we can identify as an equipment issue? Is it a process issue within Syncrude or you know we are talking about too few or maybe not quite the right people in place?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
No, this is a specific equipment issue, which is unlikely to be repeated. So, it's not something – that's what I'm confident (33:23) the longer term. This is what we in the industry call a process dead leg. So, because there's a valve in a line there's a line that has no flow in it. So we specifically understand the issue not likely to be repeated. And we've worked across the plant to identify and remove them.

So no, it's a once off, it's unfortunate, but not reflective of what you're going to see in terms of the improved utilization and reduced costs. And you know, as I say not a complete surprise, because you do get these things happen occasionally. But (34:05) I'm so confident we'll get to a 90% plus utilization and CAD 30, because this doesn't (34:11) interrupt that program.
Roger D. Read - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay. And actually that kind of steps into my next question, as you think about the OpEx performance over the last year, I think in the press release some of that is obviously due to lower natural gas prices, but where do you think you are in sort of the – where you are today, where you want to be with OpEx as a sort of a percentile marker? And I'm thinking both the Oil Sands and the E&P side business?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Okay. I mean, let me just give you some general comments. I mean, clearly it is an industry we benefited from lower gas prices for a number of years now. But they haven't changed significantly through this period. So know the costs you're seeing quarter-on-quarter and year-on-year are not largely driven by reduced energy cost.
They're primarily driven by a structured program of working hard to drive systematically cost out of the system. So both in Oil Sands and E&P, and in the downstream, you are seeing, in fact, in the corporate center as well, we have a program in each of those areas.
In terms of the cost reductions, and I mean, we can be more specific off of the core (35:35), if you like, but just generally, something like approximately 70% of those costs we think are systematic and irreversible. So, those have come out and will stay out.
We haven't finished yet, it's a continuous program. We've made some good spikes, particularly in the Oil Sands business, again in this last quarter. So, you're going to start to see that in future quarters as we go forward.
In terms of long-term objectives, and I'll just talk about our base Oil Sands operations. I still have certain ambitious target for the guys to get us at some speed (36:24) below CAD 20 operating cost. So it's a mid to longer term project. We're still working towards it. But I can see us getting there. I mean, we're making – the strides we are making are fantastic.
I think (36:41) progress will make some of it, will be further refining our people systems, our processes, the way our supply chain works, but we've also got some technology things we've been working on. So, if you think of all the work we've been doing on autonomous trucks, if you think of all the work we've been doing on different in situ techniques, they come with comments or reductions in operating costs as well. So, we still got the program, we're working really hard at it, and there's more to come.
Roger D. Read - Wells Fargo Securities LLC
Okay, great. I appreciate it. Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Phil Gresh with JPMorgan. Your line is open. Please go ahead.
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Hi. Good morning. This is John Royall sitting in for Phil. On the CapEx rates, could you tell us how much has already occurred in 2Q versus to come (37:39) for the rest of the year?
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Sorry, John, could you repeat the question, I didn't quite catch that.
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Yeah, the CapEx rates, just wanted to know how much of it is related to things that have occurred in 2Q versus raises for the second half?
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah, we're pretty much on budget, as of today, our year-to-date, most of that will be an acceleration in the second half of the year.
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Okay, great. And then I think you talked about driving towards longer term CAD 5 billion all-in CapEx number. Is that still a good number to think about, particularly in light of everything that's going on with Syncrude? And it would be as early as 2018 that you would think about that number?

Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
No, we're talking broadly CAD 5 billion, and we've talked about it – that's a good number to put into your multiple. We talked about that for 2018 and 2019. So they are good numbers. Of course what Alister said this morning, they are obviously approximate numbers, but you can expect the money we brought forward to come out of the 2018 budget. So you will see a decrease from that CAD 5 billion.
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Okay, great. And I know you've touched on it a little bit, could you go into some more detail on the nature and the scope of exactly what you're doing in Fort Hills for the – related to the CapEx rates?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Sorry, John, your line just broke up slightly at the end. Could you repeat your question?
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Yeah, if you could just give a little more detail on the scope of what you're doing at Fort Hills with the CapEx rates? I know you mentioned it a little in the remarks.
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
It's simply – we've got the opportunity. What we are finding is that the progress we are making on secondary extraction is above the targets we had in. So we have been able to see the opportunity by retaining the workforce more this year, to be able to get the major pieces of that project complete and all of the hydro testing complete this year. We'd always planned that for the first train. There are two other trains. It looks as though we're going to be able to do that with the productivity that we have this year. So it's simply bringing that from 2018 into 2017.
John M. Royall - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Great. Thank you.
Operator
Thank you. [Operating Instructions] Our next question comes from the line of Frank McGann with Bank of America Merrill Lynch. Your line is open. Please go ahead.
Frank McGann - Bank of American Merrill Lynch
Yes. Thank you very much. Yeah, if we could go back to the Total dispute. Just to get a little bit more clarity on. Is this primarily commercial, strategic, technical, is it primarily related to the CapEx increase? What is actually driving that?
And, assuming that they were not to go along with all of the spending, does that – would that change the eventual ownership percentages as a result of a carry that you might undertake for them?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah. I mean, as I said, it's too early for all of that. We're a few days into it. I mean, as I said, we're 92% complete. So this is largely – they're not very material conversations, in terms of the context of the project.
It is a commercial discussion, not a technical discussion. And I think – I got asked several times last time on the call, are Total looking to sell parts of their project? We know that they have been looking at various strategies, but in this case, this is a commercial discussion between ourselves and Total, too early to talk about the detail.
The reassuring message I would like investors to take away is, we're 92% complete, we're not anticipating this affecting either the cost or the schedule of the remainder of the project, so, frustrating at this stage, but not that significant.
Frank McGann - Bank of American Merrill Lynch
Okay. Thanks. And if I could just follow-up, just in terms of overall cost trends, are you seeing any signs of pressure at any parts of your business?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
No. Not particularly – I mean we're seeing, particularly operating costs and capital costs still continue to move in the right direction.
Frank McGann - Bank of American Merrill Lynch
Okay. Thank you very much.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Travis Wood with the National Financial. Your line is open. Please go ahead.

Travis Wood - National Bank Financial
Yeah. Good morning guys. Just a question around the E&P business, it looks like results have been a bit better than expected. So, can you help us understand, as Hebron comes on and the ramp of that, and what that could look like to the aggregate E&P production profile over that ramp period?
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah, Travis, I think we've been clear that it's a three-year ramp-up on Hebron, as we drill the additional wells or the production wells over the next few years from the platform, that will ramp-up in 2018 19, 20 (43:23), and then about 30,000 a day in 2021. So obviously, that'll offset some of the declines that we're obviously going to see in the whole E&P portfolio without the ramp-up on Hebron.
Travis Wood - National Bank Financial
Okay. And do you think that more than offsets the other declining parts of the portfolio?
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah, to a certain extent yes, we should see some increases in E&P production, but I would caution you, it's not the whole thing, there is some declines coming in over the period as well.
Travis Wood - National Bank Financial
Okay, great.
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yeah, that sees that business remaining where it is, or maybe even slightly better, due to the middle, maybe slightly beyond, in the next decade.
Travis Wood - National Bank Financial
Okay. Thank you. I appreciate that. Thanks guys.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Dan Healing with The Canadian Press. Your line is open. Please go ahead.
Dan Healing - The Canadian Press
Good morning. Thanks for taking my question. I'm just wondering if you can be a bit more specific on what the dispute with Total involves, you said it involves funding, is that funding for the portion of the capital costs that have been moved forward, or is that for funding farther down the line?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
I mean no, it's very early stages of the dispute. It's inappropriate for me to talk in any more detail than I have done. The project is 92% complete. So, you know, we're very close to the end of – the end of the spend, it's a commercial discussion, which is not that unusual at this stage in a project of this size, and most of the spend is really set to the end of the project. We have 7,000 people on site finishing it off, and three quarters of the plant is in the hands of the operators and its being started up. So it's not unusual to have these discussions at this time.
Dan Healing - The Canadian Press
Okay. If it's not unusual, and these kinds of things happen all the time, I guess I'm wondering why you're bringing it up on a conference call, Steve?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Because it's – we are very transparent about where we are, and we think it's important to keep our investors fully appraised of where the project is.
Dan Healing - The Canadian Press
Okay. Thanks.
Operator
Thank you. And our next question comes from the line of Jeff Lewis with the The Globe & Mail, Inc. Your line is open, please go ahead.
Jeff Lewis - The Globe & Mail, Inc.
Hi, I just had two quick questions, one about the share buyback. Can you just clarify, are you suspending the share buyback now or just signaling that you have room to sort of tap the brakes on those?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
No, we're not suspending the share buyback. As Alister said, we bought about CAD 500 million worth of our shares back over the last period. We anticipate – we're still buying, as we speak today, but we buy our stock back with our free cash, after all of our other commitments. And as that cash flow fluctuates, depending on our spend and the price of crude, we'll flex it back up and down. But no, we're still committed to the program.

Jeff Lewis - The Globe & Mail, Inc.
So, still the CAD 2 billion, I believe it was level for the year?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
That's our target, but it will depend on free cash flow.
Jeff Lewis - The Globe & Mail, Inc.
Okay. And then just quickly, TransCanada has launched another open season for Keystone XL, do you see that project as still being necessary in today's market given some of the changes that we've seen?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
I mean, we generally support all of the projects which are currently seeking access to markets that we support, Keystone support Trans Mountain we support the Enbridge Line 3 project. All three of them seem to be making steady progress, which I'm encouraged by, and yeah I think you know, we certainly need these projects and it depends on you know what time they come into service. But no, I think the projects are still needed in the industry and Suncor is supporting them.
Jeff Lewis - The Globe & Mail, Inc.
So are you a shipper on Keystone XL?
Steven W. Williams - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Yes. And we're already a shipper on the lower half of Keystone, which is already operational.
Stephen Douglas - Suncor Energy, Inc.
I think we can go to the next question operator.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question comes from the line of Nia Williams with Reuters. Your line is open. Please go ahead.
Nia Williams - Reuters
Hi there. Can you give us a sense of what level WTI Suncor needs to breakeven in its Oil Sands operation? I know you've spoken about operating costs, but I'm just wondering once you put in G&A costs in transportation and blend in, what the breakeven number is?
Alister Cowan - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Okay, I think we've been very clear on this, but the breakeven cost for Suncor to cover its operating cost on sustaining capital is around US$30. If you add in the dividend it's US$40. So for you I would use US$30.
Nia Williams - Reuters
Okay. Thanks.
Operator
Thank you. And I'm not showing any further questions. And I'd like to turn the conference back over to Steve Douglas for any further remarks.
Stephen Douglas - Suncor Energy, Inc.
Thank you Michelle, and thanks everyone for joining us today. If you have further questions or detailed modeling questions, of course, we're available and welcome your call. So thanks again. We will sign off.
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you for participating in today's conference. This does conclude the program, and you may all disconnect. Everyone have a great day.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.

If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Basic Materials, Independent Oil & Gas, Canada, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All SU TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector








Suncor Energy - Wikipedia






















 






Suncor Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Suncor)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Canadian oil company. For the Australian financial company, see Suncorp Group.

Suncor Energy, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: SU
NYSE: SU
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
Montreal, Quebec, Canada in 1919


Headquarters
Calgary, Alberta, Canada



Key people

Michael Wilson, Chairman of the Board
Robert Mitchell (CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, petrochemicals and others


Revenue
 $29.68 billion CAN (2015) [1]



Net income

 ($1.99) billion CAN (2015) [1]


Total assets
CAN$77.527 billion (2015)[2]


Total equity
CAN $39.039 billion (2015)[2]



Number of employees

13,026 (2011)[3]


Website
www.suncor.com


Suncor Energy is a Canadian integrated energy company based in Calgary, Alberta. It specializes in production of synthetic crude from oil sands. Suncor ranks number 134 in the Forbes Global 2000 list.[4]
Until 2010, Suncor marketed products and services to retail customers in Ontario through a downstream network of 280 branded as Sunoco, and 200 customer-operated retail and diesel sites. Following the acquisition of former Crown corporation Petro-Canada, Suncor converted its Sunoco stations (which were all in Ontario) to Petro-Canada sites in order to unify all of its downstream retail operations under the Petro-Canada banner throughout Canada. It also enabled the company to discontinue paying licensing fees for the Sunoco brand to Sunoco Inc. in the United States. Nationwide, Petro-Canada's upstream product supplier and parent company is Suncor Energy. Suncor also markets through a retail network of Shell, Exxon, and Mobil branded outlets in Colorado.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1919-2000
1.2 2000-present


2 Operations

2.1 Bitumen, oil and natural gas production
2.2 Refining
2.3 Retail
2.4 Aircraft Fleet


3 Environmental record
4 Awards and honours
5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
1919-2000[edit]
Suncor was founded in 1919 in Montreal as Sun Company of Canada, a subsidiary of Sun Oil (now Sunoco). In 1979, Sun formed Suncor by merging its Canadian refining and retailing interests; Great Canadian Oil Sands (a majority-owned subsidiary, which constructed and operated the first commercial plant to develop Canada's Athabasca oil sands and went on production in 1967); and its conventional oil and gas interests. In 1981, the Government of Ontario purchased a 25% stake in the company; it divested in 1993. In 1995 Sun Oil also divested its interest in the company, although Suncor maintained the Sunoco retail brand in Canada. Suncor took advantage of these two divestitures to become an independent, widely held public company.
2000-present[edit]
On March 23, 2009, Suncor announced the acquisition of Petro-Canada.[6][7] This merger created a company with a combined market capitalization of C$43.3 billion. On 4 June 2009, a 98% approval rate was reached by Suncor's shareholders for the acquisition of Petro-Canada and the Competition Bureau approved the merger on June 21, 2009.[8][9] The merger with Canada's 11th largest company was completed on August 1, 2009 [10] in a $21 billion deal to form the second-largest company in Canada (after Royal Bank of Canada) in terms of market capitalization.[11]
On 27 June 2013, the company ranked first in a table of Canada's 100 biggest companies by revenue published by The Globe and Mail.
In October 2015, Suncor launched a hostile takeover bid for Canadian Oil Sands worth around $3.29 billion, following rejected advances earlier in the year in March and April.[12]
On 27 April 2016, Suncor announced that they had reached a $937-million deal to acquire Murphy Oil Corp.'s five per cent stake in the Syncrude project north of Fort McMurray, Alta. This follows the takeover of Canadian Oil Sands less than a year ago, and will increase its interest in Syncrude from just under 49 per cent to nearly 54 per cent, making it the majority shareholder of the project. [13]
Operations[edit]
In North America, Suncor develops and produces oil and natural gas in Western Canada, Colorado, and offshore drilling in eastern Canada. Its international efforts include offshore developments in the North Sea, and conventional, land-based efforts in Libya, Syria, and Trinidad and Tobago. Suncor operates refineries in Edmonton, Alberta; Sarnia, Ontario; Montreal, Quebec and Commerce City, Colorado. These refineries supply industrial, retail and commercial consumers. The company is also one of the largest Canadian retailers of petroleum products.[14]
Bitumen, oil and natural gas production[edit]
Suncor is the world's largest producer of bitumen, and owns and operates an oil sands upgrading plant near Fort McMurray, Alberta, Canada. Originally developed by Great Canadian Oil Sands, a majority-owned subsidiary of Sun Oil, it is now wholly owned by the independent Suncor. It was the first commercial development on the Athabasca oil sands, although small, earlier projects like that at Bitumount also played a role in development. The company holds a 36.75% interest in the Joslyn north oil sands project which was shelved pending an economic review by operator Total S.A. in May 2014. The company also produces conventional oil, heavy crude oil, and natural gas.[15]
Refining[edit]




Suncor Energy's refinery in Commerce City, Colorado.


In Canada, Suncor operates refineries in Alberta, Ontario and Quebec. The company's 135,000-barrel-per-day Edmonton, refinery runs entirely on oil sands-based feedstocks and produces a high-yield of light oils. A 137,000-barrel-per-day Montreal refinery produces gasoline, distillates, asphalts, heavy fuel oil, petrochemicals, solvents and feedstock for lubricants. An 85,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Sarnia, Ontario produces gasoline, kerosene, jet and diesel fuels. A 98,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Commerce City, Colorado produces gasoline, diesel fuel and paving-grade asphalt.[15]
Retail[edit]




Sunoco logo.






Petro-Canada is the brand identity of Suncor's service stations throughout Canada.


In December 2009, Husky Energy announced that it had entered into an agreement with Suncor Energy and Suncor Energy Products to purchase 98 retail outlets in the Ontario market.[16] These gas stations were to be converted from Sunoco to the Husky brand.
Suncor operated retail fuel operations under the brand names of Sunoco exclusively in Ontario until the merger of Petro-Canada and Suncor Energy on August 1, 2009. Suncor now sells its products under the Petro-Canada name across Canada. Suncor has also converted many Sunoco-branded gas stations to Petro-Canada stations. As of 2013, all former Sunoco branded stations are operating under either the Petro-Canada or Husky names. In the United States, it operates retail outlets in Colorado as Shell and Phillips 66, under licence from Shell Oil Company (the United States subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell) and Phillips 66, respectively.[17]
On April 13, 2012, Suncor Energy Products Inc. paid a $500,000 fine for being found guilty of price-fixing, by one of the company's gas stations in Ontario. This result came from a larger investigation into price-fixing by Ontario gasoline retailers.[18]
Aircraft Fleet[edit]
Suncor Energy owns and operates three Bombardier CRJ900ER aircraft (as of August 2016).[19]
Environmental record[edit]
According to a Pollution Watch fact sheet, in 2007 Suncor Energy's oil sands operations had the sixth highest greenhouse gas emissions in Canada.[20][21] While Suncor has reduced the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of its oil sands operations by more than 50% since 1990, total greenhouse gas emissions from the company's operations have increased because of growing oil sands production.
On April 2, 2009, Suncor was fined $675,000 for failing to install pollution control equipment at its Firebag operation near Fort McMurray, Alberta in July 2006. On the same day, Suncor was fined $175,000[22] for dumping untreated wastewater from a company work camp near Fort McMurray into the Athabasca River in 2007.[23][24]
In the United States, Suncor has also been fined by the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment. In April 2012, a fine of $2.2 million was assessed for air pollution. Suncor failed to monitor and control emissions a number of times throughout 2009 and 2010, and numerous emissions exceeded regulations.[25] Suncor was also cited for "failure to conduct equipment inspections, train employees, and fully develop standard procedures for operating equipment".[26] Additionally, a benzene leak into Sand Creek was discovered in the fall of 2011. Employees at Suncor and the nearby Metro Wastewater Reclamation District Plant were exposed to benzene through the air and through drinking water.[27][28]
By 2009, Suncor was working to reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds. In 2009, under the auspices of the Natural Sciences and Engineering Research Council of Canada (NSERC), Suncor teamed with the University of Alberta and Matrikon, an Edmonton-based software company, to develop separation-cell technology to potentially reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds by 50 per cent.[29]
By 2009, Suncor operated four wind farms. These provided 147 megawatts of power, providing an annual CO2 offset of 284,000 tonnes compared to coal-generated electricity.[citation needed][when?] Suncor operates an ethanol facility in St. Clair, Ontario. This ethanol is blended into retail gasoline products sold at Sunoco and some Petro-Canada service stations.[citation needed]
Awards and honours[edit]
In 2007, Suncor Energy was named one of Canada's Top 100 Employers, as published in Maclean's magazine, the largest oilsands development firm to receive this honour.[30]
In October 2008, Suncor was named one of "Canada's Top 100 Employers" by Mediacorp Canada Inc., and was featured in Maclean's newsmagazine. Later that month, Suncor was also named one of Alberta's Top Employers, which was announced by the Calgary Herald[31] and the Edmonton Journal.[32][33]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



Canadian Centre for Energy Information
History of the petroleum industry in Canada (oil sands and heavy oil)
History of the petroleum industry in Canada
Scotford Upgrader
Syncrude
Largest petroleum companies Canada
List of articles about Canadian oil sands

References[edit]



^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ "2011 Annual report (SU)" (PDF). Suncor. Retrieved 2012-07-12. 
^ "Suncor Energy on the Forbes Global 2000 List". April 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-12. 
^ "Shell and ExxonMobil". Suncor Energy. Archived from the original on 17 May 2017. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada merge". Canoe. March 23, 2009. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada announce merger". CBC News. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-12-08. 
^ Suncor shareholders add support to Petrocan deal, CTV, 4 June 2009 
^ {{cite web|url=http://www.petro-canada.ca/en/media/1886.aspx?id=1020094%7Ctitle=Competition Bureau approves merger|date=4 June 2009|publisher=Petro Canada}}
^ "Suncor, Petro Canada complete merger". bizjournals. 2009-08-06. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "A united Petro-Canada and Suncor: Canada's second-biggest company, after the Royal Bank of Canada?". National Post. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "Suncor Energy launches $4.3 billion hostile bid for Canadian Oil Sands". Reuters. 6 October 2015. 
^ "Suncor snags majority control of Syncrude with $937M Murphy Oil deal". CTV News. 
^ "2011 Annual report p.22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ a b "2011 Annual report p. 22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ "Husky Energy Announces Expansion of Retail Network". Huskyenergy.com. 2009-12-10. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Shell and Phillips 66". Suncor. 2010-06-01. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Suncor gas-price fixing reaps $500K fine". CBC News. 2012-04-13. Retrieved 14 April 2012. 
^ "Global Airline Guide 2016 (Part One)". Airliner World (October 2016): 9.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Becoming No. 1: Suncor's story". CBC News. March 23, 2009. 
^ http://www.pollutionwatch.org/pressroom/factSheetData/GHGFactSheetEng.pdf
^ "Suncor fined $850,000 for environmental violations". CBC News. April 2, 2009. 
^ "Suncor fined twice in one day". Calgaryherald.com. 2009-04-02. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ Feature story - March 10, 2009 (2009-03-10). "Ninety charges against Suncor surface a year later | Greenpeace Canada". Greenpeace.org. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ [KWGN.com web staff. (2012, April 2). Suncor fined $2.2 million for leaking cancer-causing chemical. Retrieved from http://kwgn.com/2012/04/02/suncor-fined-2-2-million-for-leaking-cancer-causing-chemical/]
^ [Finley, Bruce (2012, April 2). Suncor refinery in Commerce City will pay fine for air quality violations. The Denver Post. http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20308243/suncor-refinery-commerce-city-will-pay-fine-air]
^ [Finley, B. (2012, January 6). Suncor refinery employees tested for benzene contamination. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_19690855]
^ [Crummy, K. E. (2012, May 25). Suncor spill clean-up at Sand Creek is months, years away. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20710927/suncor-spill-clean-up-months-years-away?source=pkg]
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Why be shy about green success story?", May 2, 2009". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2007 Canada's Top 100 Employers". 
^ "Calgary Herald, "Alberta’s top 40 places to work", October 18, 2008". 
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Alberta's best focus on attracting, keeping staff", October 31, 2008". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2009 Canada's Top 100 Employers Competition". 



External links[edit]



Wikinews has related news: Suncor makes bid to take over Petro-Canada



 Media related to Suncor Energy, Montreal at Wikimedia Commons
Suncor's Official Website
Petro-Canada's Official Website







v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Petroleum industry






Petroleum
Primary energy









Benchmarks



Argus Sour
Bonny Light
Brent
Dubai
Indonesian
Isthmus-34 Light
Japan Cocktail
OPEC Reference Basket
Tapis
Urals
Western Canadian Select
West Texas Intermediate





Data




Natural gas



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price





Petroleum



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price (of gasoline and diesel)








Exploration



Core sampling
Geophysics
Integrated asset modelling
Petroleum engineering

Reservoir simulation
Seismic to simulation


Petroleum geology
Petrophysics
Reflection seismology (Seismic inversion)
Seismic source





Drilling



Blowout
Completion (Squeeze job)
Differential sticking
Directional drilling (Geosteering)
Drilling engineering
Drilling fluid (invasion)
Drill stem test
Lost circulation
Measurement
Tracers
Underbalanced drilling
Well logging





Production



Petroleum fiscal regime

Concessions
Production sharing agreements


Artificial lift

Pumpjack
Submersible pump (ESP)
Gas lift


Downstream
Enhanced oil recovery (EOR)

Steam injection
Gas reinjection


Midstream
Petroleum product
Pipeline transport
Refining
Upstream
Water injection
Well intervention
XT





History



1967 Oil Embargo
1973 oil crisis
1979 energy crisis
1980s oil glut
1990 oil price shock
2000s energy crisis
2010s oil glut
Founders
History of the petroleum industry
Nationalization
OPEC
GECF
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Oil market timelines





Provinces
and fields



List of natural gas fields
List of oil fields
East Midlands Oil Province
East Texas
Gulf of Mexico
Niger Delta
North Sea
Permian Basin
Persian Gulf
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Russia
Venezuela
Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin





Other topics



Acronyms
Oil shale gas
Peak oil

mitigation
timing


People
Petrocurrency
Petrodollar recycling
Shale gas
Swing producer
Unconventional oil

heavy crude
oil sands
oil shale















Companies and organisations








Major petroleum
companies





Supermajors



BP
Chevron
Eni
ExxonMobil
Royal Dutch Shell
Total






National oil
companies




ADNOC (UAE)
CNOOC (China)
CNPC (China)
Ecopetrol (Colombia)
Gazprom (Russia)
Iraq National Oil Company
Indian Oil Corporation
KazMunayGas (Kazakhstan)
Kuwait Petroleum Corporation
Lotos (Poland)
Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation
NIOC (Iran)
NISOC (Iran)
OGDCL (Pakistan)
ONGC (India)
PDVSA (Venezuela)
PKN Orlen (Poland)
Pemex (Mexico)
Pertamina (Indonesia)
PetroBangla (Bangladesh)
Petrobras (Brazil)
PetroChina
Petronas (Malaysia)
Petrovietnam
PTT (Thailand)
Qatar Petroleum
Rosneft (Russia)
Saudi Aramco (Saudi Arabia)
Sinopec (China)
SOCAR (Azerbaijan)
Sonangol (Angola)
Sonatrach (Algeria)
Statoil (Norway)
TPAO (Turkey)
YPF (Argentina)





Energy trading



Glencore
Gunvor
Mercuria
Naftiran Intertrade
Trafigura
Vitol





Other



Anadarko
Apache
BG Group
Cenovus Energy
Compañía Española de Petróleos
ConocoPhillips
Devon
Galp Energia
Hess
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Lukoil
Marathon Oil
Nippon Oil
Occidental
OMV
Port Harcourt Refining Company
Reliance Industries
Repsol
Suncor Energy
Surgutneftegas
TNK-BP
Tullow Oil
Tüpraş









Major services
companies




Amec Foster Wheeler
Baker Hughes
Cameron
CGG
CH2M Hill
Chicago Bridge & Iron Company
China Oilfield Services
Enbridge
Ensco
GE Oil & Gas
Halliburton
Nabors Industries
Naftiran Intertrade
National Oilwell Varco
Petrofac
Saipem
Schlumberger
Snam
Subsea 7
TransCanada
Transocean
Weatherford
Wood Group





Other



International Association of Oil & Gas Producers
International Energy Agency
International Petroleum Exchange
OPEC
Society of Petroleum Engineers
World Petroleum Council














Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Suncor_Energy&oldid=788551745"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeOil companies of CanadaCompanies based in CalgaryCompanies established in 1917Gas stations in CanadaBituminous sands of CanadaSunocoHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2013All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from November 2013Articles with unsourced statements from January 2017Commons category without a link on Wikidata 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 02:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 















FlashRatings | Principles














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN








FlashRatings' Principles

          1. FlashRatings' mission is to provide you - the investor - with as much honest and professional research on your investments as possible.
        

          2. We believe it's much better to get a multitude of credible opinions on an investment than to arbitrarily follow any single advisor - be it your banker, a friend, or a TV pundit.
        

          3. FlashRatings does NOT provide advice. Our job is to accurately and objectively report on analysts' credible research and opinions. The only advice FlashRatings will ever give you is to absorb as much fundamental research and different opinions as possible and make your own decisions!
         

          4. FlashRatings favors covering analysts with proven track records, but will cover all analysts as long as their research is honest and professional.
        



Sign up »















Suncor Energy - Wikipedia






















 






Suncor Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Suncor)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Canadian oil company. For the Australian financial company, see Suncorp Group.

Suncor Energy, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: SU
NYSE: SU
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
Montreal, Quebec, Canada in 1919


Headquarters
Calgary, Alberta, Canada



Key people

Michael Wilson, Chairman of the Board
Robert Mitchell (CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, petrochemicals and others


Revenue
 $29.68 billion CAN (2015) [1]



Net income

 ($1.99) billion CAN (2015) [1]


Total assets
CAN$77.527 billion (2015)[2]


Total equity
CAN $39.039 billion (2015)[2]



Number of employees

13,026 (2011)[3]


Website
www.suncor.com


Suncor Energy is a Canadian integrated energy company based in Calgary, Alberta. It specializes in production of synthetic crude from oil sands. Suncor ranks number 134 in the Forbes Global 2000 list.[4]
Until 2010, Suncor marketed products and services to retail customers in Ontario through a downstream network of 280 branded as Sunoco, and 200 customer-operated retail and diesel sites. Following the acquisition of former Crown corporation Petro-Canada, Suncor converted its Sunoco stations (which were all in Ontario) to Petro-Canada sites in order to unify all of its downstream retail operations under the Petro-Canada banner throughout Canada. It also enabled the company to discontinue paying licensing fees for the Sunoco brand to Sunoco Inc. in the United States. Nationwide, Petro-Canada's upstream product supplier and parent company is Suncor Energy. Suncor also markets through a retail network of Shell, Exxon, and Mobil branded outlets in Colorado.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1919-2000
1.2 2000-present


2 Operations

2.1 Bitumen, oil and natural gas production
2.2 Refining
2.3 Retail
2.4 Aircraft Fleet


3 Environmental record
4 Awards and honours
5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
1919-2000[edit]
Suncor was founded in 1919 in Montreal as Sun Company of Canada, a subsidiary of Sun Oil (now Sunoco). In 1979, Sun formed Suncor by merging its Canadian refining and retailing interests; Great Canadian Oil Sands (a majority-owned subsidiary, which constructed and operated the first commercial plant to develop Canada's Athabasca oil sands and went on production in 1967); and its conventional oil and gas interests. In 1981, the Government of Ontario purchased a 25% stake in the company; it divested in 1993. In 1995 Sun Oil also divested its interest in the company, although Suncor maintained the Sunoco retail brand in Canada. Suncor took advantage of these two divestitures to become an independent, widely held public company.
2000-present[edit]
On March 23, 2009, Suncor announced the acquisition of Petro-Canada.[6][7] This merger created a company with a combined market capitalization of C$43.3 billion. On 4 June 2009, a 98% approval rate was reached by Suncor's shareholders for the acquisition of Petro-Canada and the Competition Bureau approved the merger on June 21, 2009.[8][9] The merger with Canada's 11th largest company was completed on August 1, 2009 [10] in a $21 billion deal to form the second-largest company in Canada (after Royal Bank of Canada) in terms of market capitalization.[11]
On 27 June 2013, the company ranked first in a table of Canada's 100 biggest companies by revenue published by The Globe and Mail.
In October 2015, Suncor launched a hostile takeover bid for Canadian Oil Sands worth around $3.29 billion, following rejected advances earlier in the year in March and April.[12]
On 27 April 2016, Suncor announced that they had reached a $937-million deal to acquire Murphy Oil Corp.'s five per cent stake in the Syncrude project north of Fort McMurray, Alta. This follows the takeover of Canadian Oil Sands less than a year ago, and will increase its interest in Syncrude from just under 49 per cent to nearly 54 per cent, making it the majority shareholder of the project. [13]
Operations[edit]
In North America, Suncor develops and produces oil and natural gas in Western Canada, Colorado, and offshore drilling in eastern Canada. Its international efforts include offshore developments in the North Sea, and conventional, land-based efforts in Libya, Syria, and Trinidad and Tobago. Suncor operates refineries in Edmonton, Alberta; Sarnia, Ontario; Montreal, Quebec and Commerce City, Colorado. These refineries supply industrial, retail and commercial consumers. The company is also one of the largest Canadian retailers of petroleum products.[14]
Bitumen, oil and natural gas production[edit]
Suncor is the world's largest producer of bitumen, and owns and operates an oil sands upgrading plant near Fort McMurray, Alberta, Canada. Originally developed by Great Canadian Oil Sands, a majority-owned subsidiary of Sun Oil, it is now wholly owned by the independent Suncor. It was the first commercial development on the Athabasca oil sands, although small, earlier projects like that at Bitumount also played a role in development. The company holds a 36.75% interest in the Joslyn north oil sands project which was shelved pending an economic review by operator Total S.A. in May 2014. The company also produces conventional oil, heavy crude oil, and natural gas.[15]
Refining[edit]




Suncor Energy's refinery in Commerce City, Colorado.


In Canada, Suncor operates refineries in Alberta, Ontario and Quebec. The company's 135,000-barrel-per-day Edmonton, refinery runs entirely on oil sands-based feedstocks and produces a high-yield of light oils. A 137,000-barrel-per-day Montreal refinery produces gasoline, distillates, asphalts, heavy fuel oil, petrochemicals, solvents and feedstock for lubricants. An 85,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Sarnia, Ontario produces gasoline, kerosene, jet and diesel fuels. A 98,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Commerce City, Colorado produces gasoline, diesel fuel and paving-grade asphalt.[15]
Retail[edit]




Sunoco logo.






Petro-Canada is the brand identity of Suncor's service stations throughout Canada.


In December 2009, Husky Energy announced that it had entered into an agreement with Suncor Energy and Suncor Energy Products to purchase 98 retail outlets in the Ontario market.[16] These gas stations were to be converted from Sunoco to the Husky brand.
Suncor operated retail fuel operations under the brand names of Sunoco exclusively in Ontario until the merger of Petro-Canada and Suncor Energy on August 1, 2009. Suncor now sells its products under the Petro-Canada name across Canada. Suncor has also converted many Sunoco-branded gas stations to Petro-Canada stations. As of 2013, all former Sunoco branded stations are operating under either the Petro-Canada or Husky names. In the United States, it operates retail outlets in Colorado as Shell and Phillips 66, under licence from Shell Oil Company (the United States subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell) and Phillips 66, respectively.[17]
On April 13, 2012, Suncor Energy Products Inc. paid a $500,000 fine for being found guilty of price-fixing, by one of the company's gas stations in Ontario. This result came from a larger investigation into price-fixing by Ontario gasoline retailers.[18]
Aircraft Fleet[edit]
Suncor Energy owns and operates three Bombardier CRJ900ER aircraft (as of August 2016).[19]
Environmental record[edit]
According to a Pollution Watch fact sheet, in 2007 Suncor Energy's oil sands operations had the sixth highest greenhouse gas emissions in Canada.[20][21] While Suncor has reduced the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of its oil sands operations by more than 50% since 1990, total greenhouse gas emissions from the company's operations have increased because of growing oil sands production.
On April 2, 2009, Suncor was fined $675,000 for failing to install pollution control equipment at its Firebag operation near Fort McMurray, Alberta in July 2006. On the same day, Suncor was fined $175,000[22] for dumping untreated wastewater from a company work camp near Fort McMurray into the Athabasca River in 2007.[23][24]
In the United States, Suncor has also been fined by the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment. In April 2012, a fine of $2.2 million was assessed for air pollution. Suncor failed to monitor and control emissions a number of times throughout 2009 and 2010, and numerous emissions exceeded regulations.[25] Suncor was also cited for "failure to conduct equipment inspections, train employees, and fully develop standard procedures for operating equipment".[26] Additionally, a benzene leak into Sand Creek was discovered in the fall of 2011. Employees at Suncor and the nearby Metro Wastewater Reclamation District Plant were exposed to benzene through the air and through drinking water.[27][28]
By 2009, Suncor was working to reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds. In 2009, under the auspices of the Natural Sciences and Engineering Research Council of Canada (NSERC), Suncor teamed with the University of Alberta and Matrikon, an Edmonton-based software company, to develop separation-cell technology to potentially reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds by 50 per cent.[29]
By 2009, Suncor operated four wind farms. These provided 147 megawatts of power, providing an annual CO2 offset of 284,000 tonnes compared to coal-generated electricity.[citation needed][when?] Suncor operates an ethanol facility in St. Clair, Ontario. This ethanol is blended into retail gasoline products sold at Sunoco and some Petro-Canada service stations.[citation needed]
Awards and honours[edit]
In 2007, Suncor Energy was named one of Canada's Top 100 Employers, as published in Maclean's magazine, the largest oilsands development firm to receive this honour.[30]
In October 2008, Suncor was named one of "Canada's Top 100 Employers" by Mediacorp Canada Inc., and was featured in Maclean's newsmagazine. Later that month, Suncor was also named one of Alberta's Top Employers, which was announced by the Calgary Herald[31] and the Edmonton Journal.[32][33]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



Canadian Centre for Energy Information
History of the petroleum industry in Canada (oil sands and heavy oil)
History of the petroleum industry in Canada
Scotford Upgrader
Syncrude
Largest petroleum companies Canada
List of articles about Canadian oil sands

References[edit]



^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ "2011 Annual report (SU)" (PDF). Suncor. Retrieved 2012-07-12. 
^ "Suncor Energy on the Forbes Global 2000 List". April 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-12. 
^ "Shell and ExxonMobil". Suncor Energy. Archived from the original on 17 May 2017. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada merge". Canoe. March 23, 2009. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada announce merger". CBC News. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-12-08. 
^ Suncor shareholders add support to Petrocan deal, CTV, 4 June 2009 
^ {{cite web|url=http://www.petro-canada.ca/en/media/1886.aspx?id=1020094%7Ctitle=Competition Bureau approves merger|date=4 June 2009|publisher=Petro Canada}}
^ "Suncor, Petro Canada complete merger". bizjournals. 2009-08-06. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "A united Petro-Canada and Suncor: Canada's second-biggest company, after the Royal Bank of Canada?". National Post. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "Suncor Energy launches $4.3 billion hostile bid for Canadian Oil Sands". Reuters. 6 October 2015. 
^ "Suncor snags majority control of Syncrude with $937M Murphy Oil deal". CTV News. 
^ "2011 Annual report p.22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ a b "2011 Annual report p. 22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ "Husky Energy Announces Expansion of Retail Network". Huskyenergy.com. 2009-12-10. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Shell and Phillips 66". Suncor. 2010-06-01. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Suncor gas-price fixing reaps $500K fine". CBC News. 2012-04-13. Retrieved 14 April 2012. 
^ "Global Airline Guide 2016 (Part One)". Airliner World (October 2016): 9.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Becoming No. 1: Suncor's story". CBC News. March 23, 2009. 
^ http://www.pollutionwatch.org/pressroom/factSheetData/GHGFactSheetEng.pdf
^ "Suncor fined $850,000 for environmental violations". CBC News. April 2, 2009. 
^ "Suncor fined twice in one day". Calgaryherald.com. 2009-04-02. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ Feature story - March 10, 2009 (2009-03-10). "Ninety charges against Suncor surface a year later | Greenpeace Canada". Greenpeace.org. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ [KWGN.com web staff. (2012, April 2). Suncor fined $2.2 million for leaking cancer-causing chemical. Retrieved from http://kwgn.com/2012/04/02/suncor-fined-2-2-million-for-leaking-cancer-causing-chemical/]
^ [Finley, Bruce (2012, April 2). Suncor refinery in Commerce City will pay fine for air quality violations. The Denver Post. http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20308243/suncor-refinery-commerce-city-will-pay-fine-air]
^ [Finley, B. (2012, January 6). Suncor refinery employees tested for benzene contamination. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_19690855]
^ [Crummy, K. E. (2012, May 25). Suncor spill clean-up at Sand Creek is months, years away. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20710927/suncor-spill-clean-up-months-years-away?source=pkg]
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Why be shy about green success story?", May 2, 2009". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2007 Canada's Top 100 Employers". 
^ "Calgary Herald, "Alberta’s top 40 places to work", October 18, 2008". 
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Alberta's best focus on attracting, keeping staff", October 31, 2008". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2009 Canada's Top 100 Employers Competition". 



External links[edit]



Wikinews has related news: Suncor makes bid to take over Petro-Canada



 Media related to Suncor Energy, Montreal at Wikimedia Commons
Suncor's Official Website
Petro-Canada's Official Website







v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Petroleum industry






Petroleum
Primary energy









Benchmarks



Argus Sour
Bonny Light
Brent
Dubai
Indonesian
Isthmus-34 Light
Japan Cocktail
OPEC Reference Basket
Tapis
Urals
Western Canadian Select
West Texas Intermediate





Data




Natural gas



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price





Petroleum



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price (of gasoline and diesel)








Exploration



Core sampling
Geophysics
Integrated asset modelling
Petroleum engineering

Reservoir simulation
Seismic to simulation


Petroleum geology
Petrophysics
Reflection seismology (Seismic inversion)
Seismic source





Drilling



Blowout
Completion (Squeeze job)
Differential sticking
Directional drilling (Geosteering)
Drilling engineering
Drilling fluid (invasion)
Drill stem test
Lost circulation
Measurement
Tracers
Underbalanced drilling
Well logging





Production



Petroleum fiscal regime

Concessions
Production sharing agreements


Artificial lift

Pumpjack
Submersible pump (ESP)
Gas lift


Downstream
Enhanced oil recovery (EOR)

Steam injection
Gas reinjection


Midstream
Petroleum product
Pipeline transport
Refining
Upstream
Water injection
Well intervention
XT





History



1967 Oil Embargo
1973 oil crisis
1979 energy crisis
1980s oil glut
1990 oil price shock
2000s energy crisis
2010s oil glut
Founders
History of the petroleum industry
Nationalization
OPEC
GECF
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Oil market timelines





Provinces
and fields



List of natural gas fields
List of oil fields
East Midlands Oil Province
East Texas
Gulf of Mexico
Niger Delta
North Sea
Permian Basin
Persian Gulf
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Russia
Venezuela
Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin





Other topics



Acronyms
Oil shale gas
Peak oil

mitigation
timing


People
Petrocurrency
Petrodollar recycling
Shale gas
Swing producer
Unconventional oil

heavy crude
oil sands
oil shale















Companies and organisations








Major petroleum
companies





Supermajors



BP
Chevron
Eni
ExxonMobil
Royal Dutch Shell
Total






National oil
companies




ADNOC (UAE)
CNOOC (China)
CNPC (China)
Ecopetrol (Colombia)
Gazprom (Russia)
Iraq National Oil Company
Indian Oil Corporation
KazMunayGas (Kazakhstan)
Kuwait Petroleum Corporation
Lotos (Poland)
Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation
NIOC (Iran)
NISOC (Iran)
OGDCL (Pakistan)
ONGC (India)
PDVSA (Venezuela)
PKN Orlen (Poland)
Pemex (Mexico)
Pertamina (Indonesia)
PetroBangla (Bangladesh)
Petrobras (Brazil)
PetroChina
Petronas (Malaysia)
Petrovietnam
PTT (Thailand)
Qatar Petroleum
Rosneft (Russia)
Saudi Aramco (Saudi Arabia)
Sinopec (China)
SOCAR (Azerbaijan)
Sonangol (Angola)
Sonatrach (Algeria)
Statoil (Norway)
TPAO (Turkey)
YPF (Argentina)





Energy trading



Glencore
Gunvor
Mercuria
Naftiran Intertrade
Trafigura
Vitol





Other



Anadarko
Apache
BG Group
Cenovus Energy
Compañía Española de Petróleos
ConocoPhillips
Devon
Galp Energia
Hess
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Lukoil
Marathon Oil
Nippon Oil
Occidental
OMV
Port Harcourt Refining Company
Reliance Industries
Repsol
Suncor Energy
Surgutneftegas
TNK-BP
Tullow Oil
Tüpraş









Major services
companies




Amec Foster Wheeler
Baker Hughes
Cameron
CGG
CH2M Hill
Chicago Bridge & Iron Company
China Oilfield Services
Enbridge
Ensco
GE Oil & Gas
Halliburton
Nabors Industries
Naftiran Intertrade
National Oilwell Varco
Petrofac
Saipem
Schlumberger
Snam
Subsea 7
TransCanada
Transocean
Weatherford
Wood Group





Other



International Association of Oil & Gas Producers
International Energy Agency
International Petroleum Exchange
OPEC
Society of Petroleum Engineers
World Petroleum Council














Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Suncor_Energy&oldid=788551745"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeOil companies of CanadaCompanies based in CalgaryCompanies established in 1917Gas stations in CanadaBituminous sands of CanadaSunocoHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2013All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from November 2013Articles with unsourced statements from January 2017Commons category without a link on Wikidata 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 02:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Suncor Energy - Wikipedia






















 






Suncor Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Suncor)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Canadian oil company. For the Australian financial company, see Suncorp Group.

Suncor Energy, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: SU
NYSE: SU
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
Montreal, Quebec, Canada in 1919


Headquarters
Calgary, Alberta, Canada



Key people

Michael Wilson, Chairman of the Board
Robert Mitchell (CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, petrochemicals and others


Revenue
 $29.68 billion CAN (2015) [1]



Net income

 ($1.99) billion CAN (2015) [1]


Total assets
CAN$77.527 billion (2015)[2]


Total equity
CAN $39.039 billion (2015)[2]



Number of employees

13,026 (2011)[3]


Website
www.suncor.com


Suncor Energy is a Canadian integrated energy company based in Calgary, Alberta. It specializes in production of synthetic crude from oil sands. Suncor ranks number 134 in the Forbes Global 2000 list.[4]
Until 2010, Suncor marketed products and services to retail customers in Ontario through a downstream network of 280 branded as Sunoco, and 200 customer-operated retail and diesel sites. Following the acquisition of former Crown corporation Petro-Canada, Suncor converted its Sunoco stations (which were all in Ontario) to Petro-Canada sites in order to unify all of its downstream retail operations under the Petro-Canada banner throughout Canada. It also enabled the company to discontinue paying licensing fees for the Sunoco brand to Sunoco Inc. in the United States. Nationwide, Petro-Canada's upstream product supplier and parent company is Suncor Energy. Suncor also markets through a retail network of Shell, Exxon, and Mobil branded outlets in Colorado.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1919-2000
1.2 2000-present


2 Operations

2.1 Bitumen, oil and natural gas production
2.2 Refining
2.3 Retail
2.4 Aircraft Fleet


3 Environmental record
4 Awards and honours
5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
1919-2000[edit]
Suncor was founded in 1919 in Montreal as Sun Company of Canada, a subsidiary of Sun Oil (now Sunoco). In 1979, Sun formed Suncor by merging its Canadian refining and retailing interests; Great Canadian Oil Sands (a majority-owned subsidiary, which constructed and operated the first commercial plant to develop Canada's Athabasca oil sands and went on production in 1967); and its conventional oil and gas interests. In 1981, the Government of Ontario purchased a 25% stake in the company; it divested in 1993. In 1995 Sun Oil also divested its interest in the company, although Suncor maintained the Sunoco retail brand in Canada. Suncor took advantage of these two divestitures to become an independent, widely held public company.
2000-present[edit]
On March 23, 2009, Suncor announced the acquisition of Petro-Canada.[6][7] This merger created a company with a combined market capitalization of C$43.3 billion. On 4 June 2009, a 98% approval rate was reached by Suncor's shareholders for the acquisition of Petro-Canada and the Competition Bureau approved the merger on June 21, 2009.[8][9] The merger with Canada's 11th largest company was completed on August 1, 2009 [10] in a $21 billion deal to form the second-largest company in Canada (after Royal Bank of Canada) in terms of market capitalization.[11]
On 27 June 2013, the company ranked first in a table of Canada's 100 biggest companies by revenue published by The Globe and Mail.
In October 2015, Suncor launched a hostile takeover bid for Canadian Oil Sands worth around $3.29 billion, following rejected advances earlier in the year in March and April.[12]
On 27 April 2016, Suncor announced that they had reached a $937-million deal to acquire Murphy Oil Corp.'s five per cent stake in the Syncrude project north of Fort McMurray, Alta. This follows the takeover of Canadian Oil Sands less than a year ago, and will increase its interest in Syncrude from just under 49 per cent to nearly 54 per cent, making it the majority shareholder of the project. [13]
Operations[edit]
In North America, Suncor develops and produces oil and natural gas in Western Canada, Colorado, and offshore drilling in eastern Canada. Its international efforts include offshore developments in the North Sea, and conventional, land-based efforts in Libya, Syria, and Trinidad and Tobago. Suncor operates refineries in Edmonton, Alberta; Sarnia, Ontario; Montreal, Quebec and Commerce City, Colorado. These refineries supply industrial, retail and commercial consumers. The company is also one of the largest Canadian retailers of petroleum products.[14]
Bitumen, oil and natural gas production[edit]
Suncor is the world's largest producer of bitumen, and owns and operates an oil sands upgrading plant near Fort McMurray, Alberta, Canada. Originally developed by Great Canadian Oil Sands, a majority-owned subsidiary of Sun Oil, it is now wholly owned by the independent Suncor. It was the first commercial development on the Athabasca oil sands, although small, earlier projects like that at Bitumount also played a role in development. The company holds a 36.75% interest in the Joslyn north oil sands project which was shelved pending an economic review by operator Total S.A. in May 2014. The company also produces conventional oil, heavy crude oil, and natural gas.[15]
Refining[edit]




Suncor Energy's refinery in Commerce City, Colorado.


In Canada, Suncor operates refineries in Alberta, Ontario and Quebec. The company's 135,000-barrel-per-day Edmonton, refinery runs entirely on oil sands-based feedstocks and produces a high-yield of light oils. A 137,000-barrel-per-day Montreal refinery produces gasoline, distillates, asphalts, heavy fuel oil, petrochemicals, solvents and feedstock for lubricants. An 85,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Sarnia, Ontario produces gasoline, kerosene, jet and diesel fuels. A 98,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Commerce City, Colorado produces gasoline, diesel fuel and paving-grade asphalt.[15]
Retail[edit]




Sunoco logo.






Petro-Canada is the brand identity of Suncor's service stations throughout Canada.


In December 2009, Husky Energy announced that it had entered into an agreement with Suncor Energy and Suncor Energy Products to purchase 98 retail outlets in the Ontario market.[16] These gas stations were to be converted from Sunoco to the Husky brand.
Suncor operated retail fuel operations under the brand names of Sunoco exclusively in Ontario until the merger of Petro-Canada and Suncor Energy on August 1, 2009. Suncor now sells its products under the Petro-Canada name across Canada. Suncor has also converted many Sunoco-branded gas stations to Petro-Canada stations. As of 2013, all former Sunoco branded stations are operating under either the Petro-Canada or Husky names. In the United States, it operates retail outlets in Colorado as Shell and Phillips 66, under licence from Shell Oil Company (the United States subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell) and Phillips 66, respectively.[17]
On April 13, 2012, Suncor Energy Products Inc. paid a $500,000 fine for being found guilty of price-fixing, by one of the company's gas stations in Ontario. This result came from a larger investigation into price-fixing by Ontario gasoline retailers.[18]
Aircraft Fleet[edit]
Suncor Energy owns and operates three Bombardier CRJ900ER aircraft (as of August 2016).[19]
Environmental record[edit]
According to a Pollution Watch fact sheet, in 2007 Suncor Energy's oil sands operations had the sixth highest greenhouse gas emissions in Canada.[20][21] While Suncor has reduced the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of its oil sands operations by more than 50% since 1990, total greenhouse gas emissions from the company's operations have increased because of growing oil sands production.
On April 2, 2009, Suncor was fined $675,000 for failing to install pollution control equipment at its Firebag operation near Fort McMurray, Alberta in July 2006. On the same day, Suncor was fined $175,000[22] for dumping untreated wastewater from a company work camp near Fort McMurray into the Athabasca River in 2007.[23][24]
In the United States, Suncor has also been fined by the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment. In April 2012, a fine of $2.2 million was assessed for air pollution. Suncor failed to monitor and control emissions a number of times throughout 2009 and 2010, and numerous emissions exceeded regulations.[25] Suncor was also cited for "failure to conduct equipment inspections, train employees, and fully develop standard procedures for operating equipment".[26] Additionally, a benzene leak into Sand Creek was discovered in the fall of 2011. Employees at Suncor and the nearby Metro Wastewater Reclamation District Plant were exposed to benzene through the air and through drinking water.[27][28]
By 2009, Suncor was working to reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds. In 2009, under the auspices of the Natural Sciences and Engineering Research Council of Canada (NSERC), Suncor teamed with the University of Alberta and Matrikon, an Edmonton-based software company, to develop separation-cell technology to potentially reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds by 50 per cent.[29]
By 2009, Suncor operated four wind farms. These provided 147 megawatts of power, providing an annual CO2 offset of 284,000 tonnes compared to coal-generated electricity.[citation needed][when?] Suncor operates an ethanol facility in St. Clair, Ontario. This ethanol is blended into retail gasoline products sold at Sunoco and some Petro-Canada service stations.[citation needed]
Awards and honours[edit]
In 2007, Suncor Energy was named one of Canada's Top 100 Employers, as published in Maclean's magazine, the largest oilsands development firm to receive this honour.[30]
In October 2008, Suncor was named one of "Canada's Top 100 Employers" by Mediacorp Canada Inc., and was featured in Maclean's newsmagazine. Later that month, Suncor was also named one of Alberta's Top Employers, which was announced by the Calgary Herald[31] and the Edmonton Journal.[32][33]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



Canadian Centre for Energy Information
History of the petroleum industry in Canada (oil sands and heavy oil)
History of the petroleum industry in Canada
Scotford Upgrader
Syncrude
Largest petroleum companies Canada
List of articles about Canadian oil sands

References[edit]



^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ "2011 Annual report (SU)" (PDF). Suncor. Retrieved 2012-07-12. 
^ "Suncor Energy on the Forbes Global 2000 List". April 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-12. 
^ "Shell and ExxonMobil". Suncor Energy. Archived from the original on 17 May 2017. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada merge". Canoe. March 23, 2009. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada announce merger". CBC News. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-12-08. 
^ Suncor shareholders add support to Petrocan deal, CTV, 4 June 2009 
^ {{cite web|url=http://www.petro-canada.ca/en/media/1886.aspx?id=1020094%7Ctitle=Competition Bureau approves merger|date=4 June 2009|publisher=Petro Canada}}
^ "Suncor, Petro Canada complete merger". bizjournals. 2009-08-06. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "A united Petro-Canada and Suncor: Canada's second-biggest company, after the Royal Bank of Canada?". National Post. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "Suncor Energy launches $4.3 billion hostile bid for Canadian Oil Sands". Reuters. 6 October 2015. 
^ "Suncor snags majority control of Syncrude with $937M Murphy Oil deal". CTV News. 
^ "2011 Annual report p.22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ a b "2011 Annual report p. 22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ "Husky Energy Announces Expansion of Retail Network". Huskyenergy.com. 2009-12-10. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Shell and Phillips 66". Suncor. 2010-06-01. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Suncor gas-price fixing reaps $500K fine". CBC News. 2012-04-13. Retrieved 14 April 2012. 
^ "Global Airline Guide 2016 (Part One)". Airliner World (October 2016): 9.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Becoming No. 1: Suncor's story". CBC News. March 23, 2009. 
^ http://www.pollutionwatch.org/pressroom/factSheetData/GHGFactSheetEng.pdf
^ "Suncor fined $850,000 for environmental violations". CBC News. April 2, 2009. 
^ "Suncor fined twice in one day". Calgaryherald.com. 2009-04-02. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ Feature story - March 10, 2009 (2009-03-10). "Ninety charges against Suncor surface a year later | Greenpeace Canada". Greenpeace.org. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ [KWGN.com web staff. (2012, April 2). Suncor fined $2.2 million for leaking cancer-causing chemical. Retrieved from http://kwgn.com/2012/04/02/suncor-fined-2-2-million-for-leaking-cancer-causing-chemical/]
^ [Finley, Bruce (2012, April 2). Suncor refinery in Commerce City will pay fine for air quality violations. The Denver Post. http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20308243/suncor-refinery-commerce-city-will-pay-fine-air]
^ [Finley, B. (2012, January 6). Suncor refinery employees tested for benzene contamination. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_19690855]
^ [Crummy, K. E. (2012, May 25). Suncor spill clean-up at Sand Creek is months, years away. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20710927/suncor-spill-clean-up-months-years-away?source=pkg]
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Why be shy about green success story?", May 2, 2009". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2007 Canada's Top 100 Employers". 
^ "Calgary Herald, "Alberta’s top 40 places to work", October 18, 2008". 
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Alberta's best focus on attracting, keeping staff", October 31, 2008". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2009 Canada's Top 100 Employers Competition". 



External links[edit]



Wikinews has related news: Suncor makes bid to take over Petro-Canada



 Media related to Suncor Energy, Montreal at Wikimedia Commons
Suncor's Official Website
Petro-Canada's Official Website







v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Petroleum industry






Petroleum
Primary energy









Benchmarks



Argus Sour
Bonny Light
Brent
Dubai
Indonesian
Isthmus-34 Light
Japan Cocktail
OPEC Reference Basket
Tapis
Urals
Western Canadian Select
West Texas Intermediate





Data




Natural gas



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price





Petroleum



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price (of gasoline and diesel)








Exploration



Core sampling
Geophysics
Integrated asset modelling
Petroleum engineering

Reservoir simulation
Seismic to simulation


Petroleum geology
Petrophysics
Reflection seismology (Seismic inversion)
Seismic source





Drilling



Blowout
Completion (Squeeze job)
Differential sticking
Directional drilling (Geosteering)
Drilling engineering
Drilling fluid (invasion)
Drill stem test
Lost circulation
Measurement
Tracers
Underbalanced drilling
Well logging





Production



Petroleum fiscal regime

Concessions
Production sharing agreements


Artificial lift

Pumpjack
Submersible pump (ESP)
Gas lift


Downstream
Enhanced oil recovery (EOR)

Steam injection
Gas reinjection


Midstream
Petroleum product
Pipeline transport
Refining
Upstream
Water injection
Well intervention
XT





History



1967 Oil Embargo
1973 oil crisis
1979 energy crisis
1980s oil glut
1990 oil price shock
2000s energy crisis
2010s oil glut
Founders
History of the petroleum industry
Nationalization
OPEC
GECF
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Oil market timelines





Provinces
and fields



List of natural gas fields
List of oil fields
East Midlands Oil Province
East Texas
Gulf of Mexico
Niger Delta
North Sea
Permian Basin
Persian Gulf
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Russia
Venezuela
Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin





Other topics



Acronyms
Oil shale gas
Peak oil

mitigation
timing


People
Petrocurrency
Petrodollar recycling
Shale gas
Swing producer
Unconventional oil

heavy crude
oil sands
oil shale















Companies and organisations








Major petroleum
companies





Supermajors



BP
Chevron
Eni
ExxonMobil
Royal Dutch Shell
Total






National oil
companies




ADNOC (UAE)
CNOOC (China)
CNPC (China)
Ecopetrol (Colombia)
Gazprom (Russia)
Iraq National Oil Company
Indian Oil Corporation
KazMunayGas (Kazakhstan)
Kuwait Petroleum Corporation
Lotos (Poland)
Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation
NIOC (Iran)
NISOC (Iran)
OGDCL (Pakistan)
ONGC (India)
PDVSA (Venezuela)
PKN Orlen (Poland)
Pemex (Mexico)
Pertamina (Indonesia)
PetroBangla (Bangladesh)
Petrobras (Brazil)
PetroChina
Petronas (Malaysia)
Petrovietnam
PTT (Thailand)
Qatar Petroleum
Rosneft (Russia)
Saudi Aramco (Saudi Arabia)
Sinopec (China)
SOCAR (Azerbaijan)
Sonangol (Angola)
Sonatrach (Algeria)
Statoil (Norway)
TPAO (Turkey)
YPF (Argentina)





Energy trading



Glencore
Gunvor
Mercuria
Naftiran Intertrade
Trafigura
Vitol





Other



Anadarko
Apache
BG Group
Cenovus Energy
Compañía Española de Petróleos
ConocoPhillips
Devon
Galp Energia
Hess
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Lukoil
Marathon Oil
Nippon Oil
Occidental
OMV
Port Harcourt Refining Company
Reliance Industries
Repsol
Suncor Energy
Surgutneftegas
TNK-BP
Tullow Oil
Tüpraş









Major services
companies




Amec Foster Wheeler
Baker Hughes
Cameron
CGG
CH2M Hill
Chicago Bridge & Iron Company
China Oilfield Services
Enbridge
Ensco
GE Oil & Gas
Halliburton
Nabors Industries
Naftiran Intertrade
National Oilwell Varco
Petrofac
Saipem
Schlumberger
Snam
Subsea 7
TransCanada
Transocean
Weatherford
Wood Group





Other



International Association of Oil & Gas Producers
International Energy Agency
International Petroleum Exchange
OPEC
Society of Petroleum Engineers
World Petroleum Council














Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Suncor_Energy&oldid=788551745"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeOil companies of CanadaCompanies based in CalgaryCompanies established in 1917Gas stations in CanadaBituminous sands of CanadaSunocoHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2013All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from November 2013Articles with unsourced statements from January 2017Commons category without a link on Wikidata 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 02:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Suncor Energy - Wikipedia






















 






Suncor Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Suncor)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Canadian oil company. For the Australian financial company, see Suncorp Group.

Suncor Energy, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: SU
NYSE: SU
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
Montreal, Quebec, Canada in 1919


Headquarters
Calgary, Alberta, Canada



Key people

Michael Wilson, Chairman of the Board
Robert Mitchell (CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, petrochemicals and others


Revenue
 $29.68 billion CAN (2015) [1]



Net income

 ($1.99) billion CAN (2015) [1]


Total assets
CAN$77.527 billion (2015)[2]


Total equity
CAN $39.039 billion (2015)[2]



Number of employees

13,026 (2011)[3]


Website
www.suncor.com


Suncor Energy is a Canadian integrated energy company based in Calgary, Alberta. It specializes in production of synthetic crude from oil sands. Suncor ranks number 134 in the Forbes Global 2000 list.[4]
Until 2010, Suncor marketed products and services to retail customers in Ontario through a downstream network of 280 branded as Sunoco, and 200 customer-operated retail and diesel sites. Following the acquisition of former Crown corporation Petro-Canada, Suncor converted its Sunoco stations (which were all in Ontario) to Petro-Canada sites in order to unify all of its downstream retail operations under the Petro-Canada banner throughout Canada. It also enabled the company to discontinue paying licensing fees for the Sunoco brand to Sunoco Inc. in the United States. Nationwide, Petro-Canada's upstream product supplier and parent company is Suncor Energy. Suncor also markets through a retail network of Shell, Exxon, and Mobil branded outlets in Colorado.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1919-2000
1.2 2000-present


2 Operations

2.1 Bitumen, oil and natural gas production
2.2 Refining
2.3 Retail
2.4 Aircraft Fleet


3 Environmental record
4 Awards and honours
5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
1919-2000[edit]
Suncor was founded in 1919 in Montreal as Sun Company of Canada, a subsidiary of Sun Oil (now Sunoco). In 1979, Sun formed Suncor by merging its Canadian refining and retailing interests; Great Canadian Oil Sands (a majority-owned subsidiary, which constructed and operated the first commercial plant to develop Canada's Athabasca oil sands and went on production in 1967); and its conventional oil and gas interests. In 1981, the Government of Ontario purchased a 25% stake in the company; it divested in 1993. In 1995 Sun Oil also divested its interest in the company, although Suncor maintained the Sunoco retail brand in Canada. Suncor took advantage of these two divestitures to become an independent, widely held public company.
2000-present[edit]
On March 23, 2009, Suncor announced the acquisition of Petro-Canada.[6][7] This merger created a company with a combined market capitalization of C$43.3 billion. On 4 June 2009, a 98% approval rate was reached by Suncor's shareholders for the acquisition of Petro-Canada and the Competition Bureau approved the merger on June 21, 2009.[8][9] The merger with Canada's 11th largest company was completed on August 1, 2009 [10] in a $21 billion deal to form the second-largest company in Canada (after Royal Bank of Canada) in terms of market capitalization.[11]
On 27 June 2013, the company ranked first in a table of Canada's 100 biggest companies by revenue published by The Globe and Mail.
In October 2015, Suncor launched a hostile takeover bid for Canadian Oil Sands worth around $3.29 billion, following rejected advances earlier in the year in March and April.[12]
On 27 April 2016, Suncor announced that they had reached a $937-million deal to acquire Murphy Oil Corp.'s five per cent stake in the Syncrude project north of Fort McMurray, Alta. This follows the takeover of Canadian Oil Sands less than a year ago, and will increase its interest in Syncrude from just under 49 per cent to nearly 54 per cent, making it the majority shareholder of the project. [13]
Operations[edit]
In North America, Suncor develops and produces oil and natural gas in Western Canada, Colorado, and offshore drilling in eastern Canada. Its international efforts include offshore developments in the North Sea, and conventional, land-based efforts in Libya, Syria, and Trinidad and Tobago. Suncor operates refineries in Edmonton, Alberta; Sarnia, Ontario; Montreal, Quebec and Commerce City, Colorado. These refineries supply industrial, retail and commercial consumers. The company is also one of the largest Canadian retailers of petroleum products.[14]
Bitumen, oil and natural gas production[edit]
Suncor is the world's largest producer of bitumen, and owns and operates an oil sands upgrading plant near Fort McMurray, Alberta, Canada. Originally developed by Great Canadian Oil Sands, a majority-owned subsidiary of Sun Oil, it is now wholly owned by the independent Suncor. It was the first commercial development on the Athabasca oil sands, although small, earlier projects like that at Bitumount also played a role in development. The company holds a 36.75% interest in the Joslyn north oil sands project which was shelved pending an economic review by operator Total S.A. in May 2014. The company also produces conventional oil, heavy crude oil, and natural gas.[15]
Refining[edit]




Suncor Energy's refinery in Commerce City, Colorado.


In Canada, Suncor operates refineries in Alberta, Ontario and Quebec. The company's 135,000-barrel-per-day Edmonton, refinery runs entirely on oil sands-based feedstocks and produces a high-yield of light oils. A 137,000-barrel-per-day Montreal refinery produces gasoline, distillates, asphalts, heavy fuel oil, petrochemicals, solvents and feedstock for lubricants. An 85,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Sarnia, Ontario produces gasoline, kerosene, jet and diesel fuels. A 98,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Commerce City, Colorado produces gasoline, diesel fuel and paving-grade asphalt.[15]
Retail[edit]




Sunoco logo.






Petro-Canada is the brand identity of Suncor's service stations throughout Canada.


In December 2009, Husky Energy announced that it had entered into an agreement with Suncor Energy and Suncor Energy Products to purchase 98 retail outlets in the Ontario market.[16] These gas stations were to be converted from Sunoco to the Husky brand.
Suncor operated retail fuel operations under the brand names of Sunoco exclusively in Ontario until the merger of Petro-Canada and Suncor Energy on August 1, 2009. Suncor now sells its products under the Petro-Canada name across Canada. Suncor has also converted many Sunoco-branded gas stations to Petro-Canada stations. As of 2013, all former Sunoco branded stations are operating under either the Petro-Canada or Husky names. In the United States, it operates retail outlets in Colorado as Shell and Phillips 66, under licence from Shell Oil Company (the United States subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell) and Phillips 66, respectively.[17]
On April 13, 2012, Suncor Energy Products Inc. paid a $500,000 fine for being found guilty of price-fixing, by one of the company's gas stations in Ontario. This result came from a larger investigation into price-fixing by Ontario gasoline retailers.[18]
Aircraft Fleet[edit]
Suncor Energy owns and operates three Bombardier CRJ900ER aircraft (as of August 2016).[19]
Environmental record[edit]
According to a Pollution Watch fact sheet, in 2007 Suncor Energy's oil sands operations had the sixth highest greenhouse gas emissions in Canada.[20][21] While Suncor has reduced the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of its oil sands operations by more than 50% since 1990, total greenhouse gas emissions from the company's operations have increased because of growing oil sands production.
On April 2, 2009, Suncor was fined $675,000 for failing to install pollution control equipment at its Firebag operation near Fort McMurray, Alberta in July 2006. On the same day, Suncor was fined $175,000[22] for dumping untreated wastewater from a company work camp near Fort McMurray into the Athabasca River in 2007.[23][24]
In the United States, Suncor has also been fined by the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment. In April 2012, a fine of $2.2 million was assessed for air pollution. Suncor failed to monitor and control emissions a number of times throughout 2009 and 2010, and numerous emissions exceeded regulations.[25] Suncor was also cited for "failure to conduct equipment inspections, train employees, and fully develop standard procedures for operating equipment".[26] Additionally, a benzene leak into Sand Creek was discovered in the fall of 2011. Employees at Suncor and the nearby Metro Wastewater Reclamation District Plant were exposed to benzene through the air and through drinking water.[27][28]
By 2009, Suncor was working to reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds. In 2009, under the auspices of the Natural Sciences and Engineering Research Council of Canada (NSERC), Suncor teamed with the University of Alberta and Matrikon, an Edmonton-based software company, to develop separation-cell technology to potentially reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds by 50 per cent.[29]
By 2009, Suncor operated four wind farms. These provided 147 megawatts of power, providing an annual CO2 offset of 284,000 tonnes compared to coal-generated electricity.[citation needed][when?] Suncor operates an ethanol facility in St. Clair, Ontario. This ethanol is blended into retail gasoline products sold at Sunoco and some Petro-Canada service stations.[citation needed]
Awards and honours[edit]
In 2007, Suncor Energy was named one of Canada's Top 100 Employers, as published in Maclean's magazine, the largest oilsands development firm to receive this honour.[30]
In October 2008, Suncor was named one of "Canada's Top 100 Employers" by Mediacorp Canada Inc., and was featured in Maclean's newsmagazine. Later that month, Suncor was also named one of Alberta's Top Employers, which was announced by the Calgary Herald[31] and the Edmonton Journal.[32][33]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



Canadian Centre for Energy Information
History of the petroleum industry in Canada (oil sands and heavy oil)
History of the petroleum industry in Canada
Scotford Upgrader
Syncrude
Largest petroleum companies Canada
List of articles about Canadian oil sands

References[edit]



^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ "2011 Annual report (SU)" (PDF). Suncor. Retrieved 2012-07-12. 
^ "Suncor Energy on the Forbes Global 2000 List". April 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-12. 
^ "Shell and ExxonMobil". Suncor Energy. Archived from the original on 17 May 2017. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada merge". Canoe. March 23, 2009. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada announce merger". CBC News. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-12-08. 
^ Suncor shareholders add support to Petrocan deal, CTV, 4 June 2009 
^ {{cite web|url=http://www.petro-canada.ca/en/media/1886.aspx?id=1020094%7Ctitle=Competition Bureau approves merger|date=4 June 2009|publisher=Petro Canada}}
^ "Suncor, Petro Canada complete merger". bizjournals. 2009-08-06. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "A united Petro-Canada and Suncor: Canada's second-biggest company, after the Royal Bank of Canada?". National Post. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "Suncor Energy launches $4.3 billion hostile bid for Canadian Oil Sands". Reuters. 6 October 2015. 
^ "Suncor snags majority control of Syncrude with $937M Murphy Oil deal". CTV News. 
^ "2011 Annual report p.22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ a b "2011 Annual report p. 22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ "Husky Energy Announces Expansion of Retail Network". Huskyenergy.com. 2009-12-10. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Shell and Phillips 66". Suncor. 2010-06-01. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Suncor gas-price fixing reaps $500K fine". CBC News. 2012-04-13. Retrieved 14 April 2012. 
^ "Global Airline Guide 2016 (Part One)". Airliner World (October 2016): 9.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Becoming No. 1: Suncor's story". CBC News. March 23, 2009. 
^ http://www.pollutionwatch.org/pressroom/factSheetData/GHGFactSheetEng.pdf
^ "Suncor fined $850,000 for environmental violations". CBC News. April 2, 2009. 
^ "Suncor fined twice in one day". Calgaryherald.com. 2009-04-02. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ Feature story - March 10, 2009 (2009-03-10). "Ninety charges against Suncor surface a year later | Greenpeace Canada". Greenpeace.org. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ [KWGN.com web staff. (2012, April 2). Suncor fined $2.2 million for leaking cancer-causing chemical. Retrieved from http://kwgn.com/2012/04/02/suncor-fined-2-2-million-for-leaking-cancer-causing-chemical/]
^ [Finley, Bruce (2012, April 2). Suncor refinery in Commerce City will pay fine for air quality violations. The Denver Post. http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20308243/suncor-refinery-commerce-city-will-pay-fine-air]
^ [Finley, B. (2012, January 6). Suncor refinery employees tested for benzene contamination. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_19690855]
^ [Crummy, K. E. (2012, May 25). Suncor spill clean-up at Sand Creek is months, years away. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20710927/suncor-spill-clean-up-months-years-away?source=pkg]
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Why be shy about green success story?", May 2, 2009". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2007 Canada's Top 100 Employers". 
^ "Calgary Herald, "Alberta’s top 40 places to work", October 18, 2008". 
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Alberta's best focus on attracting, keeping staff", October 31, 2008". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2009 Canada's Top 100 Employers Competition". 



External links[edit]



Wikinews has related news: Suncor makes bid to take over Petro-Canada



 Media related to Suncor Energy, Montreal at Wikimedia Commons
Suncor's Official Website
Petro-Canada's Official Website







v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Petroleum industry






Petroleum
Primary energy









Benchmarks



Argus Sour
Bonny Light
Brent
Dubai
Indonesian
Isthmus-34 Light
Japan Cocktail
OPEC Reference Basket
Tapis
Urals
Western Canadian Select
West Texas Intermediate





Data




Natural gas



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price





Petroleum



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price (of gasoline and diesel)








Exploration



Core sampling
Geophysics
Integrated asset modelling
Petroleum engineering

Reservoir simulation
Seismic to simulation


Petroleum geology
Petrophysics
Reflection seismology (Seismic inversion)
Seismic source





Drilling



Blowout
Completion (Squeeze job)
Differential sticking
Directional drilling (Geosteering)
Drilling engineering
Drilling fluid (invasion)
Drill stem test
Lost circulation
Measurement
Tracers
Underbalanced drilling
Well logging





Production



Petroleum fiscal regime

Concessions
Production sharing agreements


Artificial lift

Pumpjack
Submersible pump (ESP)
Gas lift


Downstream
Enhanced oil recovery (EOR)

Steam injection
Gas reinjection


Midstream
Petroleum product
Pipeline transport
Refining
Upstream
Water injection
Well intervention
XT





History



1967 Oil Embargo
1973 oil crisis
1979 energy crisis
1980s oil glut
1990 oil price shock
2000s energy crisis
2010s oil glut
Founders
History of the petroleum industry
Nationalization
OPEC
GECF
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Oil market timelines





Provinces
and fields



List of natural gas fields
List of oil fields
East Midlands Oil Province
East Texas
Gulf of Mexico
Niger Delta
North Sea
Permian Basin
Persian Gulf
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Russia
Venezuela
Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin





Other topics



Acronyms
Oil shale gas
Peak oil

mitigation
timing


People
Petrocurrency
Petrodollar recycling
Shale gas
Swing producer
Unconventional oil

heavy crude
oil sands
oil shale















Companies and organisations








Major petroleum
companies





Supermajors



BP
Chevron
Eni
ExxonMobil
Royal Dutch Shell
Total






National oil
companies




ADNOC (UAE)
CNOOC (China)
CNPC (China)
Ecopetrol (Colombia)
Gazprom (Russia)
Iraq National Oil Company
Indian Oil Corporation
KazMunayGas (Kazakhstan)
Kuwait Petroleum Corporation
Lotos (Poland)
Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation
NIOC (Iran)
NISOC (Iran)
OGDCL (Pakistan)
ONGC (India)
PDVSA (Venezuela)
PKN Orlen (Poland)
Pemex (Mexico)
Pertamina (Indonesia)
PetroBangla (Bangladesh)
Petrobras (Brazil)
PetroChina
Petronas (Malaysia)
Petrovietnam
PTT (Thailand)
Qatar Petroleum
Rosneft (Russia)
Saudi Aramco (Saudi Arabia)
Sinopec (China)
SOCAR (Azerbaijan)
Sonangol (Angola)
Sonatrach (Algeria)
Statoil (Norway)
TPAO (Turkey)
YPF (Argentina)





Energy trading



Glencore
Gunvor
Mercuria
Naftiran Intertrade
Trafigura
Vitol





Other



Anadarko
Apache
BG Group
Cenovus Energy
Compañía Española de Petróleos
ConocoPhillips
Devon
Galp Energia
Hess
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Lukoil
Marathon Oil
Nippon Oil
Occidental
OMV
Port Harcourt Refining Company
Reliance Industries
Repsol
Suncor Energy
Surgutneftegas
TNK-BP
Tullow Oil
Tüpraş









Major services
companies




Amec Foster Wheeler
Baker Hughes
Cameron
CGG
CH2M Hill
Chicago Bridge & Iron Company
China Oilfield Services
Enbridge
Ensco
GE Oil & Gas
Halliburton
Nabors Industries
Naftiran Intertrade
National Oilwell Varco
Petrofac
Saipem
Schlumberger
Snam
Subsea 7
TransCanada
Transocean
Weatherford
Wood Group





Other



International Association of Oil & Gas Producers
International Energy Agency
International Petroleum Exchange
OPEC
Society of Petroleum Engineers
World Petroleum Council














Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Suncor_Energy&oldid=788551745"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeOil companies of CanadaCompanies based in CalgaryCompanies established in 1917Gas stations in CanadaBituminous sands of CanadaSunocoHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2013All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from November 2013Articles with unsourced statements from January 2017Commons category without a link on Wikidata 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 02:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Suncor Energy - Wikipedia






















 






Suncor Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Suncor)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the Canadian oil company. For the Australian financial company, see Suncorp Group.

Suncor Energy, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
TSX: SU
NYSE: SU
S&P/TSX 60 component


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
Montreal, Quebec, Canada in 1919


Headquarters
Calgary, Alberta, Canada



Key people

Michael Wilson, Chairman of the Board
Robert Mitchell (CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas, petrochemicals and others


Revenue
 $29.68 billion CAN (2015) [1]



Net income

 ($1.99) billion CAN (2015) [1]


Total assets
CAN$77.527 billion (2015)[2]


Total equity
CAN $39.039 billion (2015)[2]



Number of employees

13,026 (2011)[3]


Website
www.suncor.com


Suncor Energy is a Canadian integrated energy company based in Calgary, Alberta. It specializes in production of synthetic crude from oil sands. Suncor ranks number 134 in the Forbes Global 2000 list.[4]
Until 2010, Suncor marketed products and services to retail customers in Ontario through a downstream network of 280 branded as Sunoco, and 200 customer-operated retail and diesel sites. Following the acquisition of former Crown corporation Petro-Canada, Suncor converted its Sunoco stations (which were all in Ontario) to Petro-Canada sites in order to unify all of its downstream retail operations under the Petro-Canada banner throughout Canada. It also enabled the company to discontinue paying licensing fees for the Sunoco brand to Sunoco Inc. in the United States. Nationwide, Petro-Canada's upstream product supplier and parent company is Suncor Energy. Suncor also markets through a retail network of Shell, Exxon, and Mobil branded outlets in Colorado.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1919-2000
1.2 2000-present


2 Operations

2.1 Bitumen, oil and natural gas production
2.2 Refining
2.3 Retail
2.4 Aircraft Fleet


3 Environmental record
4 Awards and honours
5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
1919-2000[edit]
Suncor was founded in 1919 in Montreal as Sun Company of Canada, a subsidiary of Sun Oil (now Sunoco). In 1979, Sun formed Suncor by merging its Canadian refining and retailing interests; Great Canadian Oil Sands (a majority-owned subsidiary, which constructed and operated the first commercial plant to develop Canada's Athabasca oil sands and went on production in 1967); and its conventional oil and gas interests. In 1981, the Government of Ontario purchased a 25% stake in the company; it divested in 1993. In 1995 Sun Oil also divested its interest in the company, although Suncor maintained the Sunoco retail brand in Canada. Suncor took advantage of these two divestitures to become an independent, widely held public company.
2000-present[edit]
On March 23, 2009, Suncor announced the acquisition of Petro-Canada.[6][7] This merger created a company with a combined market capitalization of C$43.3 billion. On 4 June 2009, a 98% approval rate was reached by Suncor's shareholders for the acquisition of Petro-Canada and the Competition Bureau approved the merger on June 21, 2009.[8][9] The merger with Canada's 11th largest company was completed on August 1, 2009 [10] in a $21 billion deal to form the second-largest company in Canada (after Royal Bank of Canada) in terms of market capitalization.[11]
On 27 June 2013, the company ranked first in a table of Canada's 100 biggest companies by revenue published by The Globe and Mail.
In October 2015, Suncor launched a hostile takeover bid for Canadian Oil Sands worth around $3.29 billion, following rejected advances earlier in the year in March and April.[12]
On 27 April 2016, Suncor announced that they had reached a $937-million deal to acquire Murphy Oil Corp.'s five per cent stake in the Syncrude project north of Fort McMurray, Alta. This follows the takeover of Canadian Oil Sands less than a year ago, and will increase its interest in Syncrude from just under 49 per cent to nearly 54 per cent, making it the majority shareholder of the project. [13]
Operations[edit]
In North America, Suncor develops and produces oil and natural gas in Western Canada, Colorado, and offshore drilling in eastern Canada. Its international efforts include offshore developments in the North Sea, and conventional, land-based efforts in Libya, Syria, and Trinidad and Tobago. Suncor operates refineries in Edmonton, Alberta; Sarnia, Ontario; Montreal, Quebec and Commerce City, Colorado. These refineries supply industrial, retail and commercial consumers. The company is also one of the largest Canadian retailers of petroleum products.[14]
Bitumen, oil and natural gas production[edit]
Suncor is the world's largest producer of bitumen, and owns and operates an oil sands upgrading plant near Fort McMurray, Alberta, Canada. Originally developed by Great Canadian Oil Sands, a majority-owned subsidiary of Sun Oil, it is now wholly owned by the independent Suncor. It was the first commercial development on the Athabasca oil sands, although small, earlier projects like that at Bitumount also played a role in development. The company holds a 36.75% interest in the Joslyn north oil sands project which was shelved pending an economic review by operator Total S.A. in May 2014. The company also produces conventional oil, heavy crude oil, and natural gas.[15]
Refining[edit]




Suncor Energy's refinery in Commerce City, Colorado.


In Canada, Suncor operates refineries in Alberta, Ontario and Quebec. The company's 135,000-barrel-per-day Edmonton, refinery runs entirely on oil sands-based feedstocks and produces a high-yield of light oils. A 137,000-barrel-per-day Montreal refinery produces gasoline, distillates, asphalts, heavy fuel oil, petrochemicals, solvents and feedstock for lubricants. An 85,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Sarnia, Ontario produces gasoline, kerosene, jet and diesel fuels. A 98,000-barrel-per-day refinery in Commerce City, Colorado produces gasoline, diesel fuel and paving-grade asphalt.[15]
Retail[edit]




Sunoco logo.






Petro-Canada is the brand identity of Suncor's service stations throughout Canada.


In December 2009, Husky Energy announced that it had entered into an agreement with Suncor Energy and Suncor Energy Products to purchase 98 retail outlets in the Ontario market.[16] These gas stations were to be converted from Sunoco to the Husky brand.
Suncor operated retail fuel operations under the brand names of Sunoco exclusively in Ontario until the merger of Petro-Canada and Suncor Energy on August 1, 2009. Suncor now sells its products under the Petro-Canada name across Canada. Suncor has also converted many Sunoco-branded gas stations to Petro-Canada stations. As of 2013, all former Sunoco branded stations are operating under either the Petro-Canada or Husky names. In the United States, it operates retail outlets in Colorado as Shell and Phillips 66, under licence from Shell Oil Company (the United States subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell) and Phillips 66, respectively.[17]
On April 13, 2012, Suncor Energy Products Inc. paid a $500,000 fine for being found guilty of price-fixing, by one of the company's gas stations in Ontario. This result came from a larger investigation into price-fixing by Ontario gasoline retailers.[18]
Aircraft Fleet[edit]
Suncor Energy owns and operates three Bombardier CRJ900ER aircraft (as of August 2016).[19]
Environmental record[edit]
According to a Pollution Watch fact sheet, in 2007 Suncor Energy's oil sands operations had the sixth highest greenhouse gas emissions in Canada.[20][21] While Suncor has reduced the greenhouse gas emissions intensity of its oil sands operations by more than 50% since 1990, total greenhouse gas emissions from the company's operations have increased because of growing oil sands production.
On April 2, 2009, Suncor was fined $675,000 for failing to install pollution control equipment at its Firebag operation near Fort McMurray, Alberta in July 2006. On the same day, Suncor was fined $175,000[22] for dumping untreated wastewater from a company work camp near Fort McMurray into the Athabasca River in 2007.[23][24]
In the United States, Suncor has also been fined by the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment. In April 2012, a fine of $2.2 million was assessed for air pollution. Suncor failed to monitor and control emissions a number of times throughout 2009 and 2010, and numerous emissions exceeded regulations.[25] Suncor was also cited for "failure to conduct equipment inspections, train employees, and fully develop standard procedures for operating equipment".[26] Additionally, a benzene leak into Sand Creek was discovered in the fall of 2011. Employees at Suncor and the nearby Metro Wastewater Reclamation District Plant were exposed to benzene through the air and through drinking water.[27][28]
By 2009, Suncor was working to reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds. In 2009, under the auspices of the Natural Sciences and Engineering Research Council of Canada (NSERC), Suncor teamed with the University of Alberta and Matrikon, an Edmonton-based software company, to develop separation-cell technology to potentially reduce the amount of bitumen entering tailings ponds by 50 per cent.[29]
By 2009, Suncor operated four wind farms. These provided 147 megawatts of power, providing an annual CO2 offset of 284,000 tonnes compared to coal-generated electricity.[citation needed][when?] Suncor operates an ethanol facility in St. Clair, Ontario. This ethanol is blended into retail gasoline products sold at Sunoco and some Petro-Canada service stations.[citation needed]
Awards and honours[edit]
In 2007, Suncor Energy was named one of Canada's Top 100 Employers, as published in Maclean's magazine, the largest oilsands development firm to receive this honour.[30]
In October 2008, Suncor was named one of "Canada's Top 100 Employers" by Mediacorp Canada Inc., and was featured in Maclean's newsmagazine. Later that month, Suncor was also named one of Alberta's Top Employers, which was announced by the Calgary Herald[31] and the Edmonton Journal.[32][33]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



Canadian Centre for Energy Information
History of the petroleum industry in Canada (oil sands and heavy oil)
History of the petroleum industry in Canada
Scotford Upgrader
Syncrude
Largest petroleum companies Canada
List of articles about Canadian oil sands

References[edit]



^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ a b "Market Activity". Retrieved 2017-01-19. 
^ "2011 Annual report (SU)" (PDF). Suncor. Retrieved 2012-07-12. 
^ "Suncor Energy on the Forbes Global 2000 List". April 2012. Retrieved 2012-11-12. 
^ "Shell and ExxonMobil". Suncor Energy. Archived from the original on 17 May 2017. Retrieved 17 May 2017. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada merge". Canoe. March 23, 2009. 
^ "Suncor, Petro-Canada announce merger". CBC News. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-12-08. 
^ Suncor shareholders add support to Petrocan deal, CTV, 4 June 2009 
^ {{cite web|url=http://www.petro-canada.ca/en/media/1886.aspx?id=1020094%7Ctitle=Competition Bureau approves merger|date=4 June 2009|publisher=Petro Canada}}
^ "Suncor, Petro Canada complete merger". bizjournals. 2009-08-06. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "A united Petro-Canada and Suncor: Canada's second-biggest company, after the Royal Bank of Canada?". National Post. 2009-03-23. Retrieved 2009-08-11. 
^ "Suncor Energy launches $4.3 billion hostile bid for Canadian Oil Sands". Reuters. 6 October 2015. 
^ "Suncor snags majority control of Syncrude with $937M Murphy Oil deal". CTV News. 
^ "2011 Annual report p.22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ a b "2011 Annual report p. 22" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-06-14. 
^ "Husky Energy Announces Expansion of Retail Network". Huskyenergy.com. 2009-12-10. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Shell and Phillips 66". Suncor. 2010-06-01. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ "Suncor gas-price fixing reaps $500K fine". CBC News. 2012-04-13. Retrieved 14 April 2012. 
^ "Global Airline Guide 2016 (Part One)". Airliner World (October 2016): 9.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ "Becoming No. 1: Suncor's story". CBC News. March 23, 2009. 
^ http://www.pollutionwatch.org/pressroom/factSheetData/GHGFactSheetEng.pdf
^ "Suncor fined $850,000 for environmental violations". CBC News. April 2, 2009. 
^ "Suncor fined twice in one day". Calgaryherald.com. 2009-04-02. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ Feature story - March 10, 2009 (2009-03-10). "Ninety charges against Suncor surface a year later | Greenpeace Canada". Greenpeace.org. Retrieved 2011-03-10. 
^ [KWGN.com web staff. (2012, April 2). Suncor fined $2.2 million for leaking cancer-causing chemical. Retrieved from http://kwgn.com/2012/04/02/suncor-fined-2-2-million-for-leaking-cancer-causing-chemical/]
^ [Finley, Bruce (2012, April 2). Suncor refinery in Commerce City will pay fine for air quality violations. The Denver Post. http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20308243/suncor-refinery-commerce-city-will-pay-fine-air]
^ [Finley, B. (2012, January 6). Suncor refinery employees tested for benzene contamination. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_19690855]
^ [Crummy, K. E. (2012, May 25). Suncor spill clean-up at Sand Creek is months, years away. The Denver Post. Retrieved from http://www.denverpost.com/breakingnews/ci_20710927/suncor-spill-clean-up-months-years-away?source=pkg]
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Why be shy about green success story?", May 2, 2009". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2007 Canada's Top 100 Employers". 
^ "Calgary Herald, "Alberta’s top 40 places to work", October 18, 2008". 
^ "Edmonton Journal, "Alberta's best focus on attracting, keeping staff", October 31, 2008". 
^ "Reasons for Selection, 2009 Canada's Top 100 Employers Competition". 



External links[edit]



Wikinews has related news: Suncor makes bid to take over Petro-Canada



 Media related to Suncor Energy, Montreal at Wikimedia Commons
Suncor's Official Website
Petro-Canada's Official Website







v
t
e


S&P/TSX 60 companies of Canada (February 22, 2016)






Agnico Eagle Mines
Agrium
ARC Resources
Bank of Montreal
Barrick Gold
BCE Inc.
BlackBerry
Bombardier
Brookfield Asset Management
Cameco
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
Canadian National
Canadian Natural Resources
Canadian Pacific
Canadian Tire
CCL Industries
Cenovus Energy
CGI Group
Constellation Software
Couche-Tard
Crescent Point Energy
Dollarama
Emera
Enbridge
Encana
First Quantum Minerals
Franco-Nevada
Fortis Inc.
Gildan
Goldcorp
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Inter Pipeline
Kinross Gold
Loblaw Companies
Magna International
Manulife Financial
Metro
National Bank of Canada
Pembina Pipeline
PotashCorp
Power Corporation
Restaurant Brands International
Rogers Communications
Royal Bank of Canada
Saputo
Scotiabank
Shaw Communications
Silver Wheaton
SNC-Lavalin
Sun Life Financial
Suncor Energy
Teck
Telus
Thomson Reuters
Toronto-Dominion Bank
TransCanada
Valeant
Weston
Waste Connections












v
t
e


Petroleum industry






Petroleum
Primary energy









Benchmarks



Argus Sour
Bonny Light
Brent
Dubai
Indonesian
Isthmus-34 Light
Japan Cocktail
OPEC Reference Basket
Tapis
Urals
Western Canadian Select
West Texas Intermediate





Data




Natural gas



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price





Petroleum



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price (of gasoline and diesel)








Exploration



Core sampling
Geophysics
Integrated asset modelling
Petroleum engineering

Reservoir simulation
Seismic to simulation


Petroleum geology
Petrophysics
Reflection seismology (Seismic inversion)
Seismic source





Drilling



Blowout
Completion (Squeeze job)
Differential sticking
Directional drilling (Geosteering)
Drilling engineering
Drilling fluid (invasion)
Drill stem test
Lost circulation
Measurement
Tracers
Underbalanced drilling
Well logging





Production



Petroleum fiscal regime

Concessions
Production sharing agreements


Artificial lift

Pumpjack
Submersible pump (ESP)
Gas lift


Downstream
Enhanced oil recovery (EOR)

Steam injection
Gas reinjection


Midstream
Petroleum product
Pipeline transport
Refining
Upstream
Water injection
Well intervention
XT





History



1967 Oil Embargo
1973 oil crisis
1979 energy crisis
1980s oil glut
1990 oil price shock
2000s energy crisis
2010s oil glut
Founders
History of the petroleum industry
Nationalization
OPEC
GECF
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Oil market timelines





Provinces
and fields



List of natural gas fields
List of oil fields
East Midlands Oil Province
East Texas
Gulf of Mexico
Niger Delta
North Sea
Permian Basin
Persian Gulf
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Russia
Venezuela
Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin





Other topics



Acronyms
Oil shale gas
Peak oil

mitigation
timing


People
Petrocurrency
Petrodollar recycling
Shale gas
Swing producer
Unconventional oil

heavy crude
oil sands
oil shale















Companies and organisations








Major petroleum
companies





Supermajors



BP
Chevron
Eni
ExxonMobil
Royal Dutch Shell
Total






National oil
companies




ADNOC (UAE)
CNOOC (China)
CNPC (China)
Ecopetrol (Colombia)
Gazprom (Russia)
Iraq National Oil Company
Indian Oil Corporation
KazMunayGas (Kazakhstan)
Kuwait Petroleum Corporation
Lotos (Poland)
Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation
NIOC (Iran)
NISOC (Iran)
OGDCL (Pakistan)
ONGC (India)
PDVSA (Venezuela)
PKN Orlen (Poland)
Pemex (Mexico)
Pertamina (Indonesia)
PetroBangla (Bangladesh)
Petrobras (Brazil)
PetroChina
Petronas (Malaysia)
Petrovietnam
PTT (Thailand)
Qatar Petroleum
Rosneft (Russia)
Saudi Aramco (Saudi Arabia)
Sinopec (China)
SOCAR (Azerbaijan)
Sonangol (Angola)
Sonatrach (Algeria)
Statoil (Norway)
TPAO (Turkey)
YPF (Argentina)





Energy trading



Glencore
Gunvor
Mercuria
Naftiran Intertrade
Trafigura
Vitol





Other



Anadarko
Apache
BG Group
Cenovus Energy
Compañía Española de Petróleos
ConocoPhillips
Devon
Galp Energia
Hess
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Lukoil
Marathon Oil
Nippon Oil
Occidental
OMV
Port Harcourt Refining Company
Reliance Industries
Repsol
Suncor Energy
Surgutneftegas
TNK-BP
Tullow Oil
Tüpraş









Major services
companies




Amec Foster Wheeler
Baker Hughes
Cameron
CGG
CH2M Hill
Chicago Bridge & Iron Company
China Oilfield Services
Enbridge
Ensco
GE Oil & Gas
Halliburton
Nabors Industries
Naftiran Intertrade
National Oilwell Varco
Petrofac
Saipem
Schlumberger
Snam
Subsea 7
TransCanada
Transocean
Weatherford
Wood Group





Other



International Association of Oil & Gas Producers
International Energy Agency
International Petroleum Exchange
OPEC
Society of Petroleum Engineers
World Petroleum Council














Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Suncor_Energy&oldid=788551745"					
Categories: S&P/TSX 60 IndexS&P/TSX Composite IndexCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on the Toronto Stock ExchangeOil companies of CanadaCompanies based in CalgaryCompanies established in 1917Gas stations in CanadaBituminous sands of CanadaSunocoHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2013All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from November 2013Articles with unsourced statements from January 2017Commons category without a link on Wikidata 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 July 2017, at 02:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






 









Suncor Energy Inc. (USA) Continues to Grow in Q2 Earnings and Is a Definite Buy | The Motley Fool Canada



















































 
  











The Motley Fool



MENU







Suncor Energy Inc. Continues to Grow in Q2 Earnings and Is a Definite Buy

David Jagielski | July 27, 2017 | More on:  SU SU








 




Suncor Energy Inc. (TSX:SU)(NYSE:SU) released Q2 earnings on Wednesday, showing yet another profitable quarter — the fourth in succession. Suncor recorded revenues of $7.2 billion in Q2, up year over year by over 22%. Total earnings for the quarter were $435 million for earnings per share of $0.26. A big reason for that was that the company’s oil sands produced 200,000 more barrels per day than a year ago, almost doubling production. However, the Fort McMurray fires last year were a big reason for 2016’s lower production totals, as operations were shut down during that time.

Segment analysis

Suncor’s oil sands…


To keep reading, enter your email address or login below.

Register by giving us your email below to continue reading all of the content on the site. Also receive a free Email Newsletter from the Motley Fool. (You may unsubscribe any time.)
Already a member? Login here.






I consent to receiving information from The Motley Fool via email, direct mail, and occasional special offer phone calls. 

I understand I can unsubscribe from these updates at any time.  Please read the Privacy Statement and Terms of Service for more information.











Suncor Energy Inc. (TSX:SU)(NYSE:SU) released Q2 earnings on Wednesday, showing yet another profitable quarter — the fourth in succession. Suncor recorded revenues of $7.2 billion in Q2, up year over year by over 22%. Total earnings for the quarter were $435 million for earnings per share of $0.26. A big reason for that was that the company’s oil sands produced 200,000 more barrels per day than a year ago, almost doubling production. However, the Fort McMurray fires last year were a big reason for 2016’s lower production totals, as operations were shut down during that time.
Segment analysis
Suncor’s oil sands segment had just under $2.5 billion in sales for the quarter, more than double the previous year. However, the segment was not able to turn a profit and incurred a loss of $277 million, although that was still an improvement from a loss of over $1 billion last year. On a year-to-date basis, the segment was able to record a profit of $25 million, up from a loss of $1.5 billion a year ago.
The exploration and production segment saw a 26% increase in net revenue from $579 million a year ago to $731 million in 2017. The segment contributed $182 million in operating earnings, or seven times the $26 million in earnings it posted a year ago. Production in this segment was also up to 125,500 barrels per day, an increase of over 6% from last year.
The refining and marketing segment totaled revenues of $4.7 billion and was up just 3% year over year. This segment actually showed a decrease in profitability with earnings of $346 million in 2017 compared to $689 million in the prior year.
Cost per barrel is down
Suncor has been committed to cost-cutting initiatives. As a result of that and economies of scale from more production, Q2 saw a operating cost per barrel of just $27.80 compared with $46.80 from a year ago. These costs suggest that even as oil declines, Suncor may still be able to turn a profit from its operations, although it will need to continue at similar production levels to achieve the same economies.
Stock performance and valuation
Year to date, Suncor’s stock has declined by over 11%, but in the past 12 months, it has netted a gain of 8%. With the company’s trailing 12 months now showing a profit of $2.7 billion, the earnings per share for the company are now up to $1.63 (previously they were $0.92). With a price of just under $39 as of the end of Wednesday, that would make Suncor’s price-to-earnings multiple improve to just 23, which is down from the 43 times earnings that it was trading at before the Q2 results.
The company is also trading at just 1.4 times book value, which is a low multiple for a company of Suncor’s size and strength. The relatively low multiples that Suncor is trading at should make it an appealing investment to many value investors. There is also something for dividend investors, as the stock currently pays dividends quarterly for an annual yield of 3.28%. Suncor also has a good track record of regularly increasing dividends as well — normally by at least 20% per year.
Bottom line
There is something for every investor here — something everyone can like about Suncor’s stock. It is a solid investment on all angles, and although it may not provide the greatest returns (27% over the past five years), it provides stability, growth, and a good dividend. The stock has a mix of many good attributes which make it an appealing investment for just about anyone.

The Next Canadian Superbrand You've Never Heard of...
This small-cap stock is "Hidden in Plain Sight!" It's flying under the radar and is being touted as a "royalty collector" by several of our top Canadian analysts.
Right now you aren't on the list to receive our formal "buy recommendation", so don't delay - simply click here to enter your email address and discover how you can access the exclusive report.
 



Fool contributor David Jagielski has no position in any stocks mentioned. 






NEW! This Stock Could Be Like Buying Amazon In 1997

For only the 5th time in over 14 years, Motley Fool co-founder David Gardner just issued a Buy Recommendation on this recent Canadian IPO. 
Stock Advisor Canada’s Chief Investment Adviser, Iain Butler, also recommended this company back in March – and it’s already up a whopping 57%! 
Enter your email address below to find out how you can claim your copy of this brand new report, “Breakthrough IPO Receives Rare Endorsement.” 






I consent to receiving information from The Motley Fool via email, direct mail, and occasional special offer phone calls. I understand I can unsubscribe from these updates at any time. Please read the Privacy Statement and Terms of Service for more information. 









 



This Recent “Buy” Alert Is Already Up 235% -- But It’s Not
Too Late To Get In! -- Click Here To Find Out More!

 




Why are over 15,130 well-positioned and in-the-know Canadian investors all counting down to two very specific days this month at 4 p.m.?

It has to do with an amazingly telling profit signal we’ve come to call a “Ground Floor Event” (even though it’s completely unrelated to an IPO)…
And one that’s made a few lucky investors who’ve paid close attention to under-the-radar events like these gains of 832%... 5,480%... and even 7,902% over the past 5 to 10 years. 
You can join the roughly 0.03% of Canadians who’ve already positioned themselves to capitalize on this next “Ground Floor Event” – but you must act soon…






I consent to receiving information from The Motley Fool via email, direct mail, and occasional special offer phone calls. 

I understand I can unsubscribe from these updates at any time.  Please read the Privacy Statement and Terms of Service for more information.









 
 
Stock Strategies 
Top TSX Stocks
Dividend Stocks
Stocks for Beginners
Bank Stocks
Energy Stocks
Tech Stocks
Metals & Mining Stocks

Fools On Facebook 




Stay Connected with the Fool












 






















FlashRatings | Contact Us














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN









Contact FlashRatings












Your emotional state
Excited
Confused
Worried
Upset
Panicked
Angry







 
























      Suncor Energy Products  Inc. - Complete profile - Canadian Company Capabilities - Industries and Business - Industry Canada
    


























































Skip to main content


Skip to "About this site"





Language selection




      Français
    






 Government of Canada


Search and menus

Search and menus




Search



Search website













Search

















  Company profile - Canadian Company Capabilities






Third-Party Information Liability Disclaimer
Some of the information on this Web page has been provided by external sources. The Government of Canada is not responsible for the accuracy, reliability or currency of the information supplied by external sources. Users wishing to rely upon this information should consult directly with the source of the information. Content provided by external sources is not subject to official languages, privacy and accessibility requirements.





      
        
          Suncor Energy Products  Inc.
        
      
    








                Company name(s) 
              




                      Legal/Operating Name
                    

                      Suncor Energy Products  Inc.
                    













                Company contact information
              







http://www.suncor.com 








customerrelations@suncor.com







(905) 804-4500







                    (905) 804-4600
                  








                Mailing address
              




                  
                  
                    2489 North Sheridan Way
                    
                  

                  
                  

                  
                  
                    MISSISSAUGA
                    
                                    
                    , 
                    
                      Ontario
                    
                    
                  

                  
                  

                  
                  
                    L5K 1A8
                    








                  Location address
                



                    
                      2489 North Sheridan Way
                      
                    
                    
                    
                      
                        MISSISSAUGA,
                        
                        Ontario
                      
                      
                    
                    
                      
                    
                    
                      L5K 1A8
                      















				Full profile
			


				Full profile
			


				Contact information
			




                Tom
                Ryley
              




	                  Title: 
	                

 
  						Executive Vice President                





                    Area of Responsibility:
  
                  


                  
                  
                    
                    Management Executive.
                  
                
              




                  Telephone:
                


                
                (416) 733-7000
             
            




                  Facsimile:
                


                
                (416) 733-8049
             
            




                Kathy
                Crooks
              




                  Title:
                



                
                
                  
                    
                  
                                
                
                Vice President                              
             
            




                    Area of Responsibility:
  
                  


                  
                  
                    
                    Domestic Sales & Marketing.
                  
                
              




                  Telephone:
                


                
                (416) 733-7000
             
            




                  Facsimile:
                


                
                (416) 733-0774
             
            




                Patricia
                Anderson
              




                  Title:
                



                
                
                  
                    
                  
                                
                
                Director                              
             
            




                    Area of Responsibility:
  
                  


                  
                  
                    
                    Government Relations.
                  
                
              




                  Telephone:
                


                
                (416) 733-7000
             
            



top of page



				Company description
			




            Country of Ownership:
          


          
            
              Canada
            
            
           
         




              Year Established:
            


            1917
          




            Exporting:
          


          
            
              Yes
            
                    
           
        




                Primary Industry (NAICS):
              


              
				
				211113 - Conventional Oil and Gas Extraction
            
          




            Alternate Industries (NAICS):
              


          
            
            324110 - Petroleum Refineries





            Primary Business Activity:
          


          
            
            Manufacturer / Processor / Producer
              
        




              Total Sales ($CDN):
            


            
            $50,000,000 +                
          




              Export Sales ($CDN):
            


            
            $50,000,000 + 
          




              Number of Employees:
            


            600 
          




				Product / Service / Licensing
			




                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            MOTOR GASOLINE REGULAR GRADE                                                                                                                          





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            MOTOR GASOLINE PREMIUM GRADE                                                                                                                          





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            MOTOR GASOLINE LEAD FREE                                                                                                                              





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            PROPANE GAS, LIQUEFIED                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            DIESEL FUEL FOR INTERNAL COMBUSTION ENGINES                                                                                                           





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            BENZOL                                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            TOLUOL                                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            XYLOL                                                                                                                                                 





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            BUTANE AND ISOBUTANE, LIQUEFIED                                                                                                                       





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL OIL NO 1 /STOVE OIL/                                                                                                                             





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL OIL NO 2                                                                                                                                         





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL OIL, RESIDUAL NO 6                                                                                                                               




                          
                            Jet fuel







                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            DERIVATIVES OF HYDROCARBONS NES                                                                                                                       





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            SULPHUR, LIQUID                                                                                                                                       





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            NATURAL GAS                                                                                                                                           





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - AVIATION TURBINE                                                                                                                               





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - DIESEL                                                                                                                                         





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - JP4                                                                                                                                            





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - OIL                                                                                                                                            





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - SOLID                                                                                                                                          





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - TURBINE                                                                                                                                        





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            GASOLINE - AUTOMOTIVE                                                                                                                                 





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            LIQUID PROPELLANT & FUEL CHEMICAL BASE                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            LIQUID PROPELLANT & FUEL PETROLEUM BASE                                                                                                               





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            OIL - GEAR LUBRICATING                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            OIL - LUBRICATING ENGINE                                                                                                                              





              FSC Code:
            


            
              9110-Fuels, Solid

              
            
              9130-Liquid Propellants and Fuels, Petroleum Base

              
            
              9135-Liquid Propellants Fuels and Oxidizers, Chemical Base

              
            
              9140-Fuel Oils

              
            
              9150-Oils and Greases: Cutting, Lubricating, and Hydraulic

              




top of page




					Market profile
				


              Geographic markets:
            

                  Export experience:
                

Belgium
Denmark
Finland
Iceland
Luxembourg
Netherlands
Norway
Sweden
United Kingdom
United States
Colorado
Connecticut
Illinois
Michigan
Minnesota
Missouri
New York
Ohio
Pennsylvania
Texas
Virginia
Wisconsin



top of page




					Third-Party Information Liability Disclaimer
				

					Some of the information on this Web page has been provided by external sources. The Government of Canada is not responsible for the accuracy, reliability or currency of the information supplied by external sources. Users wishing to rely upon this information should consult directly with the source of the information. Content provided by external sources is not subject to official languages, privacy and accessibility requirements.
				




				Contacts
			

				Contact information
			





                Tom
                Ryley
              




	                  Title: 
	                

 
  						Executive Vice President                





                    Area of Responsibility:
  
                  


                  
                  
                    
                    Management Executive.
                  
                
              




                  Telephone:
                


                
                (416) 733-7000
             
            




                  Facsimile:
                


                
                (416) 733-8049
             
            




                Kathy
                Crooks
              




                  Title:
                



                
                
                  
                    
                  
                                
                
                Vice President                              
             
            




                    Area of Responsibility:
  
                  


                  
                  
                    
                    Domestic Sales & Marketing.
                  
                
              




                  Telephone:
                


                
                (416) 733-7000
             
            




                  Facsimile:
                


                
                (416) 733-0774
             
            




                Patricia
                Anderson
              




                  Title:
                



                
                
                  
                    
                  
                                
                
                Director                              
             
            




                    Area of Responsibility:
  
                  


                  
                  
                    
                    Government Relations.
                  
                
              




                  Telephone:
                


                
                (416) 733-7000
             
            





				Description
			

				Company description
			




            Country of Ownership:
          


          
            
              Canada
            
            
           
         




              Year Established:
            


            1917
          




            Exporting:
          


          
            
              Yes
            
                    
           
        




                Primary Industry (NAICS):
              


              
				
				211113 - Conventional Oil and Gas Extraction
            
          




            Alternate Industries (NAICS):
              


          
            
            324110 - Petroleum Refineries





            Primary Business Activity:
          


          
            
            Manufacturer / Processor / Producer
              
        




              Total Sales ($CDN):
            


            
            $50,000,000 +                
          




              Export Sales ($CDN):
            


            
            $50,000,000 + 
          




              Number of Employees:
            


            600 
          





				Products, services and licensing
			

				Product / Service / Licensing
			




                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            MOTOR GASOLINE REGULAR GRADE                                                                                                                          





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            MOTOR GASOLINE PREMIUM GRADE                                                                                                                          





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            MOTOR GASOLINE LEAD FREE                                                                                                                              





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            PROPANE GAS, LIQUEFIED                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            DIESEL FUEL FOR INTERNAL COMBUSTION ENGINES                                                                                                           





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            BENZOL                                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            TOLUOL                                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            XYLOL                                                                                                                                                 





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            BUTANE AND ISOBUTANE, LIQUEFIED                                                                                                                       





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL OIL NO 1 /STOVE OIL/                                                                                                                             





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL OIL NO 2                                                                                                                                         





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL OIL, RESIDUAL NO 6                                                                                                                               




                          
                            Jet fuel







                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            DERIVATIVES OF HYDROCARBONS NES                                                                                                                       





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            SULPHUR, LIQUID                                                                                                                                       





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            NATURAL GAS                                                                                                                                           





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - AVIATION TURBINE                                                                                                                               





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - DIESEL                                                                                                                                         





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - JP4                                                                                                                                            





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - OIL                                                                                                                                            





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - SOLID                                                                                                                                          





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            FUEL - TURBINE                                                                                                                                        





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            GASOLINE - AUTOMOTIVE                                                                                                                                 





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            LIQUID PROPELLANT & FUEL CHEMICAL BASE                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            LIQUID PROPELLANT & FUEL PETROLEUM BASE                                                                                                               





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            OIL - GEAR LUBRICATING                                                                                                                                





                            
                              Product Name:
                            
                            
                            
                                                                                              
                          


                        
                      
                          
                            OIL - LUBRICATING ENGINE                                                                                                                              





              FSC Code:
            


            
              9110-Fuels, Solid

              
            
              9130-Liquid Propellants and Fuels, Petroleum Base

              
            
              9135-Liquid Propellants Fuels and Oxidizers, Chemical Base

              
            
              9140-Fuel Oils

              
            
              9150-Oils and Greases: Cutting, Lubricating, and Hydraulic

              






					Market
				

					Market profile
				


              Geographic markets:
            

                  Export experience:
                

Belgium
Denmark
Finland
Iceland
Luxembourg
Netherlands
Norway
Sweden
United Kingdom
United States
Colorado
Connecticut
Illinois
Michigan
Minnesota
Missouri
New York
Ohio
Pennsylvania
Texas
Virginia
Wisconsin






 
    Last Update Date 2016-01-11
  






Contact us


Who do you wish to contact?

The Government of Canada


The company

Close






        Date Modified:
      


            2017-06-27
          










































Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU) target price lowered to $45.00, issued a report today by TD Securities





























































Headlines
Business
Technology
Economy
Personal Finance



MenuHeadlines
Business
Technology
Economy
Personal Finance



























Don't Miss

Peet’s Buys Majority Stake in Another Coffee Chain
Walgreen Records 4Q Loss As Expected
Ebay Plans To Spin off PayPal
Tibco Taken Private by Vista Equity for $4.3 Billion
Athlon Energy (ATHL) Up Big On Buyout News
Dave & Buster’s IPO Terms Set, $16-$18 Per Share













Home / Investing / Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU) target price lowered to $45.00, issued a report today by TD Securities

Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU) target price lowered to $45.00, issued a report today by TD Securities


By Al Wild


Updated: July 27, 2017




Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU) had its target price lowered to $45.00 by TD Securities in a report released 7/27/2017.  The new target price indicates a possible upside of 0.14% based on  the company's last stock close price.
Previously on 6/8/2017, RBC Capital Markets reported about Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU) raised the target price from $0.00 to $50.00.  At the time, this indicated a possible upside of 0.22%.
Yesterday Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU) traded 2.03% higher at $39.45.  The company’s 50-day moving average is $38.52 and its 200-day moving average is $40.98.  The last stock close price is down -2.96% from the 200-day moving average, compared to the S&P 500 which has increased 0.06% over the same time.  3,137,386 shares of the stock were exchanged, up from an average trading volume of 2,683,270 
See Chart Below

Suncor Energy Inc. has a 52 week low of $33.76 and a 52 week high of $44.90 with a P/E ratio of 42.67  The company’s market cap is currently $0.
In addition to TD Securities reporting its target price, a total of 23 firms have issued a report on the stock.  The consensus target price is $34.83 with 2 firms rating the stock a strong buy, 16 firms rating the stock a buy, 5 firms rating the stock a hold, 1 firm rating the stock a underperform, and finally 0 firms rating the stock a sell.
General Information About Suncor Energy Inc. (TSE:SU)
Suncor Energy Inc. (Suncor) is an integrated energy company. The Company is focused on developing Canada's petroleum resource basin, Athabasca oil sands. The Company operates in three business segments: Oil Sands, Exploration and Production (E&P), and Refining and Marketing. The Company's Oil Sands segment includes Oil Sands operations and Oil Sands ventures operations. Its E&P segment consists of offshore operations off the east coast of Canada and in the North Sea, and onshore assets in North America, Libya and Syria. The Company's Refining and Marketing segment is engaged in Refining and Supply, and Marketing operations. In addition, it explores for, acquires, develops, produces and markets crude oil and natural gas in Canada and internationally. It transports and refines crude oil, and markets petroleum and petrochemical products primarily in Canada. It markets third-party petroleum products. Suncor also conducts energy trading activities.

Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.












Leave a Reply Cancel reply 
Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked *Comment Name * 
Email * 
Website 
 

 


















More News



Build-A-Bear Workshop (NYSE:BBW) stock price target reduced to $13.50, issued a report today by Dougherty & Co
In a report released on 7/28/2017...




A report released today by Dougherty & Co about CyberOptics (NASDAQ:CYBE) lowers the target price to $35.00
Only yesterday CyberOptics (NASDAQ:CYBE) traded -24.10%...




Omnicell (NASDAQ:OMCL) target price raised to $49.00, reported today by Dougherty & Co
Yesterday Omnicell (NASDAQ:OMCL) traded 11.63% higher...




Mizuho Securities disclosed Acadia Healthcare (NASDAQ:ACHC), hiking its price target to $60.00 earlier today
Reporting a potential upside of 0.22%,...




A statement released earlier today by Barclays about GNC Holdings (NYSE:GNC) bumps the target price to $9.00
Boasting a price of $10.95, GNC...




A statement released earlier today by Barclays about Masco (NYSE:MAS) bumps the target price to $42.00
Yesterday Masco (NYSE:MAS) traded 0.76% higher...




Gentherm (NASDAQ:THRM) target price lowered to $43.00, issued a report today by Barrington Research
Yesterday Gentherm (NASDAQ:THRM) traded -0.93% lower...




UBS announced Baxter (NYSE:BAX), bumping up its stock price target to $62.00 today
In a report released on 07/28/2017...




Ultra Clean Holdings (NASDAQ:UCTT) target price raised to $32.00, reported today by Dougherty & Co
Yesterday Ultra Clean Holdings (NASDAQ:UCTT) traded...




Barclays disclosed Cullen Frost (NYSE:CFR), dropping its stock price target to $97.00 today
Just yesterday Cullen Frost (NYSE:CFR) traded...














About Breaking Finance News
Contributors
Contact
Privacy Policy



Copyright © 2015 Breaking Finance News






























Suncor Energy Products Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 1:17 PM ET
Independent Power and Renewable Electricity Producers

Company Overview of Suncor Energy Products Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Suncor Energy Products Inc. develops, owns, and operates wind energy projects. The company also markets transportation fuels and convenience products in Canada. Its distribution channels include service stations and a network of fleet fuels sites. The company owns a business unit which provides sulphur removal and compliance services. The company was founded in 1917 and is based in North York, Canada. Suncor Energy Products Inc. operates as a subsidiary of Suncor Energy Inc.


36 York Mills RoadNorth York, ON M2P 2C5CanadaFounded in 1917



Phone: 905-804-4500

Fax: 416-733-7201








Key Executives for Suncor Energy Products Inc.




Mr. Vicky Fontana-Vatcher


      	Manager of Fleet Fuels Sales
      








Mr. Darwin James


      	Sales Manager of Commercial & Reseller Sales of Central Ontario
      








Mr. Bob DeFoa


      	Sales Manager of Commercial & Reseller Sales of Western Ontario
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 0755748 BC Ltd. Americas 3Ci wind energy Americas 4BEL Corp. Americas Aeolis Wind Power Corporation Americas Affinity Renewables Inc. Americas




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Suncor Energy Products Inc., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close






























    SU Key Statistics - Suncor Energy Inc. Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Suncor Energy Inc.

                  TOR: CA:SU
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
News
      
Charts
      



Suncor Energy Inc.




Quotes are delayed by 15 min
Jul 28, 2017, 1:01 p.m.


SU

/quotes/zigman/43712/delayed


$
40.36




Change

+0.59
+1.48%

Volume
Volume 1.59m
Quotes are delayed by 15 min








/quotes/zigman/43712/delayed
Previous close

$
			39.77
		


$
				40.36
			
Change

+0.59
+1.48%





Day low
Day high
$39.40
$40.36










52 week low
52 week high

            $33.76
        

            $44.90
        

















			Company Description 


			Suncor Energy, Inc. is an integrated energy company, which develops petroleum resource basins. Its activities include oil sands development, and upgrading, onshore and offshore oil and gas production, petroleum refining, and product marketing. It operates through the following segments: Oil Sands, E...
		


                Suncor Energy, Inc. is an integrated energy company, which develops petroleum resource basins. Its activities include oil sands development, and upgrading, onshore and offshore oil and gas production, petroleum refining, and product marketing. It operates through the following segments: Oil Sands, Exploration & Production and Refining & Marketing. The Oil Sands segment refers to the operations in the Athabasca oil sands in Alberta to develop and produce synthetic crude oil and related products through the recovery and upgrading of bitumen from mining and in situ operations. The Exploration and Production segment includes offshore activity in East Coast Canada the exploration and production of crude oil and natural gas in the United Kingdom, Norway, Libya, and Syria, and exploration and production of natural gas and natural gas liquids in Western Canada. The Refining and Marketing segment is the refining of crude oil products, and the distribution and marketing of these and other purchased products through retail stations located in Canada and the United State, as well as a lubricants plant located in Eastern Canada. The company was founded on August 1, 2009 and is headquartered in Calgary, Canada.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
144.37


P/E Ratio (with extraordinary items)
42.48


P/E Ratio (without extraordinary items)
162.59


Price to Sales Ratio
2.64


Price to Book Ratio
1.64


Price to Cash Flow Ratio
12.46


Enterprise Value to EBITDA
11.70


Enterprise Value to Sales
2.71


Total Debt to Enterprise Value
0.20

Efficiency

Revenue/Employee
2,088,260.00


Income Per Employee
33,809.00


Receivables Turnover
7.83


Total Asset Turnover
0.32

Liquidity

Current Ratio
1.33


Quick Ratio
0.94


Cash Ratio
0.36



Profitability

Gross Margin
34.82


Operating Margin
1.03


Pretax Margin
0.32


Net Margin
1.62


Return on Assets
0.52


Return on Equity
1.04


Return on Total Capital
0.75


Return on Invested Capital
0.76

Capital Structure

Total Debt to Total Equity
39.05


Total Debt to Total Capital
28.09


Total Debt to Total Assets
19.65


Long-Term Debt to Equity
36.08


Long-Term Debt to Total Capital
25.95





      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Mr. Michael M. Wilson 
65
2014
Chairman



Mr. Kris P. Smith 
-
-
Executive Vice President-Downstream



Ms. Jacynthe  Côté 
58
2015
Independent Director



Mr. Michael A. Creel 
63
2017
Director



Ms. Janice B. Odegaard 
-
-
Senior Vice President-Legal & General Counsel





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}



/news/latest/company/ca/su

      MarketWatch News on SU
    




 Oil futures end higher as Canadian wildfire hits output
3:14 p.m. May 5, 2016
 - Barbara Kollmeyer




 Suncor says it will cut 1,000 jobs as a result of oil-price slide
6:04 p.m. Jan. 13, 2015
 - Steve Goldstein




 The top prospects in global energy stocks
2:53 p.m. April 5, 2013
 - Claudia Assis




 A new twist in Canada’s ‘dead money’ debate
12:01 a.m. Sept. 7, 2012
 - Bill Mann




 Canadian banks weigh on Toronto exchange
2:26 p.m. Aug. 30, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Canadian stocks pressured by banks, commodities
11:58 a.m. Aug. 30, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Canadian stocks fall; RIM, BCE help limit losses
5:03 p.m. Aug. 8, 2012
 - Sarah Pringle




 China oil deal has Canada squirming
3:12 p.m. July 23, 2012
 - MarketWatch




 Canada stocks end lower on Europe jitters
5:16 p.m. June 11, 2012
 - Anna Andrianova




 Canadian market pressured by energy, mining stocks
11:06 a.m. May 31, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Energy, mining stocks drag on Canada market
5:12 p.m. May 30, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Energy, mining stocks weigh on Canadian market
11:37 a.m. May 30, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Canada equities score first weekly gain in a month
4:50 p.m. May 25, 2012
 - Myra P. Saefong




 Canada stocks buoyed by gold rebound
5:38 p.m. May 17, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Utilities, energy drag on Canadian stocks
4:59 p.m. May 16, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Canadian stocks rebounding after 3-day slump
11:05 a.m. May 16, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Mining, materials trash Canadian stocks
6:07 p.m. May 14, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Mining, energy stocks pressure Canadian market
11:11 a.m. May 14, 2012
 - Wallace Witkowski




 Canada stocks post second straight weekly loss
7:15 p.m. May 11, 2012
 - Carla Mozee




 Toronto energy group hit after soft U.S. jobs data
6:13 p.m. May 4, 2012
 - Carla Mozee


Loading more headlines...







/news/nonmarketwatch/company/ca/su

      Other News on SU
    





Encana Hit by Oil and Gas Prices

12:27 p.m. May 12, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canadian Natural Resources Earnings Swing to Loss

3:31 p.m. May 7, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canadian Oil Sands Posts Net Loss

9:45 p.m. April 30, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canada’s Top Oil Producer Suncor Posts Net Loss, Boosts Crude Output

12:11 a.m. April 30, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Cenovus to Cut 15% of Workforce

10:53 a.m. Feb. 12, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Husky Energy to Cut Capital Spending

9:25 a.m. Feb. 12, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Oil-Price Drop Darkens Suncor’s Results

2:43 a.m. Feb. 5, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canadian Oil Sands to Further Slash Dividend

8:26 p.m. Jan. 29, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Cenovus Cuts Capital Spending Again

6:34 p.m. Jan. 28, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Suncor Bullish on Crude Prices

10:12 p.m. Jan. 21, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





BHP Billiton Flags Write-Downs

11:46 a.m. Jan. 21, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Bank of Canada Seen Standing Pat

3:34 a.m. Feb. 18, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Oil Boss: More Job Cuts Ahead

8:01 a.m. Jan. 19, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canada to Delay Budget Until April

5:27 p.m. Jan. 15, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Suncor Energy Cuts Capital Spending

8:12 a.m. Jan. 14, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





As Oil Slips Below $50, Canada Digs In for Long Haul

3:34 a.m. Feb. 10, 2015
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canadian Oil Sands Cuts Dividend

9:00 p.m. Dec. 3, 2014
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Canaccord’s Energy Research Head Leaves

2:58 p.m. Dec. 3, 2014
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Oil Prices Fall After OPEC Stays Put

3:34 a.m. Dec. 26, 2014
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition





Suncor Will Increase Capital Spending

8:57 p.m. Nov. 18, 2014
 - The Wall Street Journal Interactive Edition


Loading more headlines...












At a Glance

Suncor Energy, Inc.
150-6th Avenue SW


Calgary, Alberta T2P 3E3




Phone
1 4032968000


Industry
Major Oil & Gas


Sector
Companies on the Energy Service


Fiscal Year-end
12/2017


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$26.81B


Net Income
$434.00M


Employees

        12,837


Annual Report for SU











/news/pressrelease/company/ca/su

      Press Releases on SU
    




 Suncor Energy reports second quarter 2017 results
8:00 p.m. July 26, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy declares dividend
7:30 p.m. July 26, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy to release second quarter 2017 financial results
6:00 p.m. July 20, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy releases 2017 Report on Sustainability
6:30 a.m. July 13, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Today's Research Reports on Enbridge, Suncor Energy, Encana and Cenovus Energy
8:18 a.m. June 21, 2017
 - ACCESSWIRE




 Suncor Energy provides update on Syncrude Mildred Lake Oil Sands facility
9:10 p.m. June 13, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy confirms restart of pipeline shipments from Syncrude Mildred Lake Oil Sands facility
6:30 a.m. May 1, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy reports voting results from Annual General Meeting
6:11 p.m. April 27, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy reports first quarter 2017 results
8:35 p.m. April 26, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy announces increased return to shareholders and early repayment of US $1.25 billion bond
7:00 p.m. April 26, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy declares dividend
6:15 p.m. April 26, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy to release first quarter 2017 financial results and hold Annual General Meeting of shareholders
6:36 p.m. April 20, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy provides update on Syncrude return to service plan
6:00 p.m. April 19, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy releases climate report
6:00 p.m. April 17, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy provides update on Syncrude recovery plan
6:30 a.m. March 27, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy to work with Alberta Energy Regulator regarding tailings and related Millennium Operational Amendment applications
5:57 p.m. March 17, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Research Reports Initiated on Energy Stocks Suncor Energy, Precision Drilling, Veresen, and Parkland Fuel
8:17 a.m. March 15, 2017
 - ACCESSWIRE




 Suncor Energy files annual disclosure documents
8:41 p.m. March 1, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy files annual disclosure documents
8:41 p.m. March 1, 2017
 - Marketwired




 Suncor Energy announces redemption of notes
7:00 p.m. Feb. 27, 2017
 - Marketwired


Loading more headlines...









Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




1:17 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
1:16pAll the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart
1:14pBaker Hughes data show weekly U.S. oil-rig count up a third time this month
1:13pAmazon’s post-earnings stock selloff is the smallest in seven years
1:13pEuropean stocks end at 3-month low as UBS falls, tech worries weigh 
1:11pSurging Australian dollar makes life tough for central bankers
1:10pU.S. weekly active oil-rig count up 2 at 766: Baker Hughes
1:10pU.S. total weekly active drilling-rig count up 8 at 958: Baker Hughes
1:10pSeptember WTI oil trades at $49.65/bbl little changed from before the rig data
1:09pWhy the SEC’s crackdown could be good for initial coin offerings
1:06pMattel shares down 8.7% in Friday trading
1:05pExpedia stock price target raised to $178 from $155 at UBS
1:05pAaron's shares up 13% in Friday trading
1:01pWhere health-care reform goes after failure to repeal and replace Obamacare
1:01pS&P 500 down 6 points, or 0.2%, at 2,470
1:00pDow industrials down 4 points at 21,792
12:59pBREAKINGNasdaq pares losses, down 5 points at 6,377
12:52pFTSE 100 closes sharply lower in tobacco-led stock rout
12:51pHere’s how much you should spend on a yoga mat (and why you should always use your own)
12:49pHow advisers can fight the ‘crisis of trust’ in financial services
12:41pHow Venezuela chaos could spark oil rally OPEC has failed to achieve 
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,794.45

-2.10
-0.01%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,373.29

-8.89
-0.14%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.43

-5.99
-0.24%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15
































































FlashRatings | About us














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN








FlashRatings - All research for my stocks!

The most comprehensive equity research coverage available online.


          Never miss a single piece of research, upgrade, downgrade or target price change by any analyst firm on any stock!
          
          Equity research by professional analysts - especially their rationales more than their forecasts - contains far more interesting and important information about the actual fundamentals of the traded companies than can be gathered from conventional news reports.
          
          Our mission is to unlock access to valuable research on stocks for all retail investors. 
          
          
         

      
          
        



Professionals/ Institutions: Take advantage of our cost-effective subscriptions to have FlashRatings's comprehensive real-time feed delivered into your intranet and trading floor platforms. (Institutional Subscriptions)


Websites: Become a content licensing partner and display FlashRatings's popular news feed on your website. (Content Licensing)


Advertisers: Advertise with us and have FlashRatings readers, with attractive demographics, take advantage of your products. (Advertising)






































Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




HOME
 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN






















Analyst Ranking





 

                    Name
                  

                    Measured Ratings
                  

                    Sucess Rate
                  

                    Avg Return
                  





                      1.
                    
Mizuho
15


                        73%
                    


                        20.57
                          %
                      




                      2.
                    
Credit Suisse
16


                        75%
                    


                        10.49
                          %
                      




                      3.
                    
Jefferies
26


                        58%
                    


                        7.91
                          %
                      




                      4.
                    
Cantor Fitzgerald
11


                        82%
                    


                        8.50
                          %
                      




                      5.
                    
Bank of America Merrill Lynch
15


                        67%
                    


                        7.85
                          %
                      




                      6.
                    
JMP Securities
20


                        65%
                    


                        4.62
                          %
                      




                      7.
                    
Goldman Sachs
21


                        67%
                    


                        3.28
                          %
                      




                      8.
                    
Raymond James
13


                        77%
                    


                        2.89
                          %
                      




                      9.
                    
FBR Capital Markets
21


                        57%
                    


                        2.45
                          %
                      




                      10.
                    
William Blair
24


                        54%
                    


                        2.32
                          %
                      



































Suncor Energy (SU) Provides 2017 Capex, Production Outlook - November 25, 2016 - Zacks.com























 




































 
Join

Sign In




Member Sign In


 Keep Me Signed In 
What does "Remember Me" do?
Forgot Password


Create a New Account







 




















 


You are being directed to ZacksTrade, a division of LBMZ Securities and licensed broker-dealer. ZacksTrade and Zacks.com are separate companies. The web link between the two companies is not a solicitation or offer to invest in a particular security or type of security. ZacksTrade does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating indiv idual securities.
If you wish to go to ZacksTrade, click OK. If you do not, click Cancel.
OK Cancel








Back to top











Suncor Energy (SU) Provides 2017 Capex, Production Outlook


Zacks Equity Research
                November 25, 2016

MDR SU BAK 

Trades from
$1











 









Read MoreHide Full Article









Canada’s largest energy firm, Suncor Energy Inc. (SU  -  Free Report)	 recently provided the production outlook and capital expenditure guidance for 2017. The company expects capital spending between C$4.8 billion and C$5.2 billion and average production in the range of 680,000–720,000 barrels of oil equivalent per day (boed). This means that the company expects production to rise by more than 13% next year and spending to fall by more than C$1 billion.Capital ExpenditureSuncor Energy expects 2017 capital spending between C$4.8 billion and C$5.2 billion. Of this, the company will use C$4.1–C$4.5 billion for the upstream segment, C$625–C$675 million for the downstream segment and the remaining for corporate purposes.About 40% of next year’s capital spending has been allocated for growth projects, mostly in the upstream segment. The remaining 60% will be used toward capital investments for safe and reliable operations as well as improving efficiency.Production OutlookThe company anticipates average per day production of 680,000–720,000 barrels of oil equivalent.Of this, 420–450 thousand barrels per day (bbl/d) are expected to be contributed by the Oil Sands segment. About 150–165 thousand bbl/d will likely be derived from the Syncrude segment, while the remaining will come from the company’s exploration and production activities.SUNCOR ENERGY Price  SUNCOR ENERGY Price | SUNCOR ENERGY QuoteRefinery throughput is expected between 425,000–445,000 bbl/d, while utilization is anticipated to range between 92% and 96%.Sales GuidanceTotal Oil Sands sales are expected in the range of 415–455 thousand bbl/d. Refined Product sales are expected to be 515–545 thousand bbl/d.Zacks Rank and Other StocksCurrently, Suncor Energy sports a Zacks Rank #1 (Strong Buy).Other well-ranked players from the broader energy sector include Braskem S.A. (BAK  -  Free Report)	, Ultra Petroleum Corp.  and McDermott International Inc. (MDR  -  Free Report)	. All these stocks sport a Zacks Rank #1 (Strong Buy). You can see the complete list of today’s Zacks #1 Rank stocks here.In the last four quarters, Braskem posted an average positive earnings surprise of 105.5%.Ultra Petroleum, on the other hand, posted an average positive earnings surprise of 65.91% in the last four quarters.In the last four quarters, McDermott posted an average positive earnings surprise of 250.00%.Confidential from Zacks Beyond this Analyst Blog, would you like to see Zacks' best recommendations that are not available to the public? Our Executive VP, Steve Reitmeister, knows when key trades are about to be triggered and which of our experts has the hottest hand. Click to see them now>>















In-Depth Zacks Research for the Tickers Above
Normally $25 each - click below to receive one report FREE:
McDermott International, Inc. (MDR) - free report >>Suncor Energy  Inc. (SU) - free report >>Braskem S.A. (BAK) - free report >>















More from Zacks Analyst Blog







VeriSign (VRSN) Beats on Q2 Earnings, Ups '17 Revenue View








BJ's Restaurants (BJRI) Falls on Q2 Earnings & Revenue Miss








Ventas (VTR) Beats Q2 FFO Estimates, Reiterates 2017 View








Mattel (MAT) Falls on Wider-than-Expected Q2 Loss, Sales Lag








›
‹





You May Like








Top Ranked Momentum Stocks to Buy for July 28th









Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for July 28th









Top Ranked Growth Stocks to Buy for July 28th









Top Ranked Value Stocks to Buy for July 28th








›
‹




 









Zacks' 7 Breakout Stocksfor July, 2017
Free Report for Zacks.com Visitors Only
Our experts cut down 220 Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys to the 7 that are most likely to jump in price immediately.
For 28 years, the full Strong Buy list has averaged a stellar +25% per year. See its 7 best stocks now.


  




Close This Panel X












Up Next




J&J (JNJ) Reportedly Approaches Actelion for Acquisition






 

Most Read








The Only Direction Cloud Companies Are Going Is Up



 




More Tech Earnings Reports



 




New Strong Buy Stocks for July 28th



 




AWS 7/28: Q2 GDP Lands at 2.6%, 1st Read



 




7/28: Are Investors Ready for 8:30am Friday?








›
‹



















 


































Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Careers - Suncor

























































 


Stock

Suncor Energy Inc., Stock Price


TSX:SU
$40.250
0.480


NYSE:SU
$32.360
0.700


20-minute delay

View stocks

























 






 


Chad — once an apprentice electrician and now a manager of electrical instrumentation — loves the ongoing challenges of his work and has fun every day.



 


Reinhold sees Suncor as full of opportunities for the person who is willing.



 


Sonja lives and works in Fort McMurray and loves the diverse community, great people and the future she sees in the company’s mining operations.




 

Home


Careers




 

Careers with Suncor




 
 

Go ahead. Expect more. Build a career where your contribution is valued and where you’re working with some of the biggest equipment in the world, with leading edge technology, and where you are learning and growing every day.





 











 

Join a respected group of people who are proud to work for Canada’s largest energy company — one with a solid track record of growth, a focus on safety and sustainability and tremendous potential for the future.





 
 

Current Suncor opportunities

Suncor is currently hiring in specific business areas. See what positions we have to offer.
Search Suncor Jobs


Find out how to apply 

Beware False Recruiting Offers




 

Read about our career opportunities

Engineers
Business Professionals
Trades & Operators
Students & New Grads






 

Search by location







 
 

Working at Suncor

Find out why so many top industry professionals choose to work at Suncor.





 

Join our Talent Community

Please tell us a little about yourself. We will use your preferences to customize your job search and notify you via emails.





 
 








 








            Last Name
        









            Email
        



















 

View more videos
Accommodations in our recruiting process are available for applicants with disabilities.
Read our Multi-Year Accessibility Plan (AODA)




 

















Contractors - Doing Business with Us - Suncor
























































 


Stock

Suncor Energy Inc., Stock Price


TSX:SU
$40.250
0.480


NYSE:SU
$32.360
0.700


20-minute delay

View stocks

























 



 

Home


Contractors




 

Contractors



 




 




Contractors
Subscribe to STORM
Travelling With Us
Foreign Travel
Marine Transportation
Contractor FAQ




Qualify to be a Contractor

Prequalification Instructions
Environment, Health & Safety Documents

Folders




Existing Contractors

Contractor Orientation
Accounts Payable
Terms and Conditions









 

Doing Business with Us
At Suncor, the term “contractor” refers to any organization, company or individual who provides goods and/or services to Suncor.
Contractors play a critical role in helping Suncor achieve its business objectives. All contractors must pre-qualify prior to performing work or providing services to Suncor.
Qualify to be a Contractor

Review the Supplier Code of Conduct (PDF, 20 pp., 1.8 MB)

Review the process
Read the prequalification instructions

Read our frequently asked questions

Review Environment, Health & Safety documents
Existing Contractor
Suncor’s codes and policies
We expect all suppliers and contractors to be familiar with and to adhere to Suncor’s Supplier Code of Conduct (PDF, 20 pp., 1.8 MB). Our Supplier Code of Conduct highlights the values that are important to Suncor and is a guide to the standard of behaviour expected of all contractors.
Read more about the policies and codes that you must comply with as an existing contractor
Contractor orientation
Find information about site access and gain access to the online orientation.
Visit contractor orientation
Accounts payable
As a Suncor contractor you’ll want to know about how our invoicing works.
Learn about invoicing requirements and submission process
Read about purchase orders and terms and conditions
Supplier Portal
Suncor is pleased to announce we are automating our procurement and invoicing processes. Our vision is to make the ‘procure to pay process’ as paperless as possible.
Using Ariba’s Spend Management Solution as the technology platform, Suncor is able to send purchase orders to our suppliers and in turn, receive invoices back for processing and payment. A number of our large suppliers have been successfully transacting with other customers using the Ariba Network for some time.
If you have not yet been contacted by your Suncor representative and would like to join the Supplier portal please contact the following:
Supplier Enablement Team at SupplierEnablement@suncor.com.
Legal & privacy policy
See Suncor.com's Legal & Privacy section for terms of service and additional resources.







 

Related Links


Qualify to be a contractor


Existing contractor


Read our frequently asked questions


Looking for a career or job? Visit our careers section

















Suncor Energy Inc. Executives, Organizational Chart, Company Profile Information, Contacts | Headquarters, Locations, News   












Submit

ContactCareersLogin

MENUtoggle
Our Difference Research Client SuccessWho We Serve Sales Professionals Marketing Professionals Executives Recruiting/Staffing ProfessionalsSolutions [Column]  ABM & ABS Actionable Intelligence Competitive Intelligence Customer Success & Retention  [Column]  Data Quality & Management Data Sets Integrations Lead Generation  [Column]  Predictive Analytics Sales & Marketing Alignment Targeting & Ranking Knowledge Hub Blog Case Studies Insights FAQsAbout Careers News Pricing

Menu

HomeOur Difference Research Client SuccessWho We Serve Sales Professionals Marketing Professionals Executives Recruiting/Staffing ProfessionalsSolutions ABM & ABS Actionable Intelligence Competitive Intelligence Customer Success & Retention Data Quality & Management Data Sets Integrations Lead Generation Predictive Analytics Sales & Marketing Alignment Targeting & RankingKnowledge Hub Blog Case Studies Insights FAQsAbout Careers News PricingGet a Free ProfileSchedule a DemoRequest PricingContact UsLogin
Home / Companies / Suncor Energy Inc.


Suncor Energy Inc.

112 4th Avenue S.W. P.O. Box 38
Calgary AB T2P 2V5 Canada
Phone: +1 403-___-____
Fax: +1 403-___-____
http://www.suncor.com





281
Managers




738
IT employees




$1.5BEST.
IT Budget




Suncor Energy sells its products in the United States, Canada, and Europe. The company, formerly known as Suncor, Inc., was founded in 1953 and changed its name to Suncor Energy, Inc. With its subsidiaries, it operates as an integrated energy… MoreSuncor Energy sells its products in the United States, Canada, and Europe. The company, formerly known as Suncor, Inc., was founded in 1953 and changed its name to Suncor Energy, Inc. With its subsidiaries, it operates as an integrated energy company. It operates through four segments: Oil Sands, Natural Gas, Energy Marketing and Refining, and Refining and Marketing.

Suncor acquired Canadian Oil Sands in March, 2016. 
IT Structure:

• The IT department of Suncor is primarily centralized at the corporate headquarters in Calgary, Alberta. 
• Suncor's IT staff consists almost entirely of consultants contracted from IBM.
• Contract with EMC Documentum and IT vendor management. 
• The Information and Knowledge Management organization(IKM), though separate from… MoreIT Structure:

• The IT department of Suncor is primarily centralized at the corporate headquarters in Calgary, Alberta. 
• Suncor's IT staff consists almost entirely of consultants contracted from IBM.
• Contract with EMC Documentum and IT vendor management. 
• The Information and Knowledge Management organization(IKM), though separate from the internal IT, provides governance services, project delivery service and support, and change management.
• IKM recently partnered with Optimized Systems and Solutions, Inc. (OSys).

IT Intelligence:

2013:
• Implemented AVEVA NET to support and strengthen data security and analytics.





Sector (Industry)
Energy & Utilities (Oil and Gas)


Employees
14683


Revenue
$20.2B


FYE
12/31




Breaking news on investment signals




Date
Type
Inside Scoop




2017-07-25
Staffing
Topic: Finance, Staffing
Company: Suncor Energy Inc., Calgary, AB
Opportunity: Seeking an Analyst Finance And Planning (AB, Calgary, T2G).




2017-07-21
Staffing
Topic: Finance, Staffing
Company: Suncor Energy Inc., Calgary, AB
Opportunity: Seeking a Senior Specialist Contract Management (AB, Calgary, T2G).




2017-07-20
Staffing
Topic: Finance, Staffing
Company: Suncor Energy Inc., Calgary, AB
Opportunity: Seeking a Lead, Finance Master Data (AB, Calgary, T2G).







Want full access to this profile and more?
RainKing's clients have access to over 1,500 new investment signals published daily, which provide insights on spending initiatives, pain points, management changes and more from companies around the globe. Interested in becoming a client?
Request a demo
Request a quote




Technologies currently being used

IT
Marketing


Data Analytics/ Databases

Business Intelligence
ActuateDundas DashboardIBM CognosInformaticaInformation BuildersLandmark SoftwareMicrosoft Power BIMicrosoft SSASMS SQL Reporting Services (SSRS)SAP BI

Data Modeling/Mining
Hyperion EssbaseOracle Data WarehousingPentahoSAP Field ServiceSAS

Data Tools
SAP Data Services
Data Infrastructure

Cloud Systems
cPanel

Desktop Virtualization
Citrix XenAppVMware Horizon (Formerly known as VMware View)VMware Virtual Desktop InfrastructureVMware Workstation

Email Hosting
Microsoft (mail server)Symantec (mail server)
Data Storage

Cloud Storage

Data Backup
Acronis SoftwareSymantec Backup ExecSymantec Enterprise VaultSymantec NetBackup

Disaster Recovery
EMC RecoverPoint
Enterprise/ ERP

CRM
APTEAN MarketFirstMicrosoft Dynamics CRMSAP CRM

Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP)
AgilysysAgressoMicrosoft DynamicsMicrosoft Dynamics AXmySAP ERPOracle JD EdwardsSAP Business OneSAP ECCSAP ERPSAP R/3

Enterprise Systems Support
Primavera Enterprise Project Portfolio ManagementSAP ApplicationsSAP Project SystemSoftware AG
Industry Software

Academic and Education Management Software

Clinical
Vistaar ACOMSmobil

Financial Trading
This is just a subset of the full Technolgies being used by this company.
Advertising/ Search

Search Engine Optimization
G Suite (Formerly known as Google Apps )Google AdSense

Search Marketing
DoubleClickMedia6Degrees
Analytics

Business Intelligence
Dundas DashboardPentahoPythonSAP BISAP Crystal ReportsSoftware AGTableau

Market Analytics
TIBCO

Marketing Data Management
Microsoft SQL ServerMySQL
Creative/ Content

Customer Experience Management
IBM WebSphere

Mobile Design
Telerik

Website Design
Adobe Creative SuiteAdobe InDesignAdobe PhotoshopAdobe ShockwaveEMC DocumentumGoogle MapsIBM FileNetLinkedInButtonMicrosoft Active Directory Web ServicesMicrosoft Visio
eCommerce

Online Retailing
Apache ServerHybrisMarketwiredShopifyVMWare

Social Commerce
Amazon (cloud)CloudFlareProlexic Technologies (Hosting)
Product/ Brand Mgmt

Forecasting and Planning

Marketing Portfolio Management
Vignette

Marketing Project Management
This is just a subset of the full Technolgies being used by this company.



Become a RainKing power-user today!
RainKing's rich data provides clients with a deeper understanding of who will be making – and what will be driving – upcoming investments in IT. Know what your prospects are planning before your competition does, and beat them to the negotiating table.
Request a demo
Request a quote




Org chart of IT decision makers




Jason Mitchell
Director, Solution Design and Build
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____






James Rogers
Manager, End User Services
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____







John Forbes
Manager, Infrastructure Design and Build
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____






Justin Jiron
Dispatch Systems Administrator
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____







Ricardo Maldonado
System Design Engineer
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____







Merardo Porras
Database Administration Specialist
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____









Ken McLaughlin
Manager, Retail Systems and Support

+1 905-___-____









Elizabeth Burton
Director, Business Engagement, Corporate and Major Projects
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____






Wendy Julian
Master Data Administrator
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____







Apurva Navagrah
Data Analyst
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____







Jay Cha
Senior Coordinator, Turnover and Database Administrator
___@suncor.com
+1 780-___-____









Joe Vetrone
Vice President, Integration and Planning, Refining and Marketing
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____






Adam Albeldawi
Manager, Upgrading Operations
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____







John Van Heyst
Manager, Marketing Logistics
___@suncor.com
+1 403-___-____





This is just a subset of the full Org Chart for this company.


Want access to this and more? Become a client today!
RainKing clients get access to all 615 decision makers in this company's org chart.
Request a demo
Request a quote








Want full access to this profile and more?
RainKing's clients have access to over 1,500 new investment signals published daily, which provide insights on spending initiatives, pain points, management changes and more from companies around the globe. Interested in becoming a client?
Request a demo
Request a quote









To receive a FREE PDF of this company, simply fill out the form below










Get your free company profile




Search





Subscribe to our newsletter



Connect with Us
 





 





 





 





 







 




7700 Old Georgetown Road
Bethesda, MD 20814-6100
1.866.592.7122
contactus@rainkingonline.com


 Sitemap Terms of Use Privacy Policy 


©2017 RainKing






Contact Us - Suncor
























































 


Stock

Suncor Energy Inc., Stock Price


TSX:SU
$40.250
0.480


NYSE:SU
$32.360
0.700


20-minute delay

View stocks

























 



 

Home


Contacts




 

Contact Us





 


At Suncor, we believe good communication is the key to building good relationships.
We value your feedback and welcome your questions or concerns about our operations. We can be reached through the following toll-free numbers, or by contacting any of the people listed below.



 


 

 Head Office
Suncor Energy Pipelines
Oil Sands
Exploration & Production
Renewable Energy
Petro-Canada
Supply & Trading
Sunoco
Refinery
Suncor Energy USA





 

Related Links
Canadian Association of Petroleum Producers website
Canadian Fuels Association
Centre for Energy website
Oil Sands Developers Group website
Canadian Wind Energy Association website
American Wind Energy Association website










 


Head Office Contacts



 
 


General Inquiries
Main Switchboard
T: 1-866-SUNCOR-1 (1-866-786-2671)
email: Suncor Information






 

For emergencies
T: 403-296-3000





 
 

 Employment Opportunities – All Locations

For general application questions, read How to Apply FAQ
Submit a resume through our online application system: Careers
If your skills match up with what we’re looking for, we’ll call the phone numbers you provided in your application and set up an interview. Suncor does not accept phone calls about general career inquiries.
If you want to connect with us directly, see our Facebook page
For technical issues, email jobs@suncor.com








 
 

Corporate Head Office
Suncor Energy Inc.
P.O. Box 2844, 150 - 6 Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 3E3
T: 403-296-8000
F: 403-296-3030





 

Media Relations
T: 403-296-4000
email: media@suncor.com

After-hours for EMERGENCIES
T: 403-852-7587





 
 

Investor Relations
T: 1-800-558-9071
email: invest@suncor.com





 

Advertising Inquiries
T: 403-296-8787
email: advertising@suncor.com





 
 

Accounts Payable
P.O. Box 1720 Stn M
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 0A2
email: Invoicing submissions 
email: All other accounts payable queries





 

Aboriginal Business Inquiries
email: aboriginal.business@suncor.com


Community Investment and Suncor Energy Foundation
P.O. Box 2844, 150 - 6 Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 3E3
email: General inquiries





 



Suncor Energy Pipelines Contacts



 
 

Suncor Energy (USA) Pipeline Co.
1715 Fleischli Parkway
Cheyenne, WY 82001
T: 307-775-8100
F: 307-637-6633





 

Suncor Energy Logistics Corporation
241 Kaska Road
Sherwood Park, Alberta
Canada T8A 4E8
T: 780-449-2100
F: 780-467-6886





 



Oil Sands Contacts



 
 

Oil Sands
P.O. Box 4015
885 Memorial Drive
Fort McMurray, Alberta 
Canada T9H 0A8
T: 780-743-6411





 

Oil Sands Suncor Business Centre
P.O. Box 4015
885 Memorial Drive
Fort McMurray, Alberta
Canada T9H 0A8
T: 780-743-6744





 
 

Stakeholder & Aboriginal Relations – Regional Municipality of Wood Buffalo
T: 1-855-600-5561
email: stakeholder.relationsrmwb@suncor.com







 



Exploration and Production Contacts



 
 


Suncor Energy – North America Onshore
(formerly called “Natural Gas”)
P.O. Box 2844, 150 - 6 Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 3E3
T: 403-296-8000
F: 403-296-3030





 

Suncor Energy East Coast Canada
Suite 201, Scotia Centre
235 Water Street
St. John’s, Newfoundland
Canada A1C 1B6
T: 709-778-3500





 
 

Suncor Energy U.K. Limited
28b Albyn Place
Aberdeen, Scotland
AB10 1YL
Switchboard: +44(0) 1224 565600
T: +44(0) 1224 56(extn)
F: +44(0) 1224 565668





 

Suncor Energy Norge AS
Løkkeveien 107
4007 Stavanger, Norway

Post: Postboks 269
Sentrum
4002 Stavanger, Norway
T: +47 51 215000
F: +47 51 215099






 

Please note that inquiries related to other international operations can be directed to the  Corporate Head Office, and your inquiry will be redirected as appropriate.


Renewable Energy Contacts



 
 

Renewable Energy
P.O. box 2844, 150 - 6 Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 3E3
T: 1-866-344-0178
email: General inquiries








 



Supply, Trading & Optimization



 
 

Suncor Energy Marketing Inc.
Suncor Energy Centre, West Tower, 21st Floor
P.O. Box 2844, 150 - 6th Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 3E3
T: 1-855-724-3795 (toll-free in North America)





 








 

                For all Petroleum Coke/Sulphur inquiries email: General inquiries



 



Petro-Canada Contacts



 
 

Petro-Canada Retail and Wholesale Marketing
2489 North Sheridan Way
Mississauga, Ontario
Canada L5K 1A8
T: 905-804-4500
F: 905-804-4747







 
 

Petro-Canada Customer Service
T: 1-800-668-0220 (TTY: 855-717-5543) 
or 647-837-2471 in Toronto, Ont.







 



Sunoco Contacts



 
 

Sunoco Customer Service
T: 1-888-858-7242







 



Refinery Contacts



 
 

Suncor Energy Products Partnership – Edmonton Refinery
P.O. Box 97 Stn Main
Edmonton, AB
Canada T5J 2G9
T: 780-410-5610
F: 780-467-8495





 

Suncor Energy Products Partnership – Sarnia Refinery
1900 St. Clair Parkway
Sarnia, Ontario
Post: P.O. Box 307, 1900 River Road
Sarnia, Ontario
Canada N7T 7J3
T: 519-337-2301
F: 519-332-3309





 
 

Suncor Energy Products Partnership – Montreal Refinery
11701 Sherbrooke St. East
Montreal, Quebec
Canada H1B 1C3
T: 514-640-8000
F: 514-645-4984







 



Suncor Energy U.S.A. Contacts



 
 

Suncor Energy USA, Inc. – Corporate Head Office
717 17th Street, Suite 2900
Denver, CO 80202
USA
T: 303-793-8000
F: 303-793-8003





 

Suncor Energy USA Inc. – Commerce City Refinery
5801 Brighton Boulevard
Commerce City, Colorado
80022, U.S.A.
T: 303-286-5701
F: 303-286-5702





 
 

Suncor Energy USA Pipeline Company
1715 Fleischli Parkway
Cheyenne, Wyoming
82001, U.S.A.
T: 307-775-8100
F: 307-637-6633





 

Suncor Energy USA – Transportation Carrier
Authorization and Insurance
c/o Business Credentialing Services, Inc.
PO Box 1258
Morristown, NJ 07960
Email: Suncor@bcsops.com
T: 1-862-242-5568
www.bcscoi.com/suncor





 














Suncor Energy reports second-quarter profit, ups capital budget | Reuters

























































































Discover Thomson ReutersFinancialGovernment SolutionsLegalReuters News AgencyRisk Management SolutionsTax & AccountingBlog: Answers OnInnovation @ Thomson ReutersDirectory of sitesLoginContactSupport2 days agoSuncor Energy reports second-quarter profit, ups capital budget#Russia#Trump#Earnings#Healthcare#CyberRisk#FutureOfMoney#Energy&EnvironmentSectionsBusinessMarketsWorldPoliticsTechCommentaryBreakingviewsMoneyLifePicturesReuters TVDiscover Thomson ReutersFinancialGovernment SolutionsLegalReuters News AgencyRisk Management SolutionsTax & AccountingBlog: Answers OnInnovation @ Thomson ReutersDirectory of sitesLoginContactSupportFeaturedPolitics Republican bid to gut Obamacare crashes in SenateBusinessAmazon's big profit miss spooks investors, but analysts stay bullishCyber RiskAlleged bitcoin fraud 'mastermind' held in Greece PicturesReuters TVEditionUnited StatesAfricaAmérica LatinaعربيArgentinaBrasilCanada中国DeutschlandEspañaFranceIndiaItalia日本MéxicoРОССИЯUnited KingdomUnited StatesJuly 27, 2017 /  12:26 AM / 2 days agoSuncor Energy reports second-quarter profit, ups capital budgetNia Williams3 Min ReadCALGARY, Alberta (Reuters) - Suncor Energy Inc (SU.TO), Canada's second-largest oil and gas producer, reported a second-quarter profit on Wednesday due to stronger crude oil prices and increased production from some upstream assets and refining operations. The company raised its 2017 capital budget to C$5.4 million-C$5.6 million, from C$4.8 million-C$5.2 million, after speeding up work at its Fort Hills oil sands project and to reflect increased costs at the Syncrude plant in northern Alberta following a fire in March. Fort Hills and Hebron, Suncor's offshore drilling project in the Atlantic, are expected to start producing oil by the end of 2017. Suncor reported a net profit of C$435 million ($349.57 million), or 26 Canadian cents per share, versus a loss of C$735 million, or 46 Canadian cents per share, during the same period a year earlier when wildfires in northern Alberta disrupted production. Suncor's operating profit, which excludes one-time items, was C$199 million, or 12 Canadian cents per share, from a loss of C$565 million, or 36 Canadian cents per share, in the year-ago period. Suncor produced a total of 539,100 barrels of oil equivalent per day in the second quarter, up from 330,700 boepd in the same period of 2016. The company produced 352,600 barrels a day from the oil sands from April to June, compared to 177,500 bpd during the same period in 2016 when the wildfires were raging. Suncor said output was impacted by a major turnaround at its Firebag oil sands project and the return to full production taking longer than expected. Continuing problems at the Syncrude plant, majority-owned by Suncor, also weighed on production. Syncrude has been running at reduced rates since a fire in March forced the company to bring forward planned maintenance and it is not expected to return to normal operating rates until early August. "Although the performance of some of our oil sands assets did not meet our expectations in the second quarter, we have full confidence in these assets," Suncor chief executive Steve Williams said in a statement. The company expects full year oil sands operating costs to be C$23-26 a barrel, from a previous forecast of C$24-27 a barrel because of lower natural gas and maintenance costs.     Refinery throughput rose to 435,500 bpd in the second quarter of 2017 from 400,200 bpd a year earlier because of lower planned maintenance and more crude availability. Editing by Leslie Adler and Bill Trott0 : 0narrow-browser-and-phonemedium-browser-and-portrait-tabletlandscape-tabletmedium-wide-browserwide-browser-and-largermedium-browser-and-landscape-tabletmedium-wide-browser-and-largerabove-phoneportrait-tablet-and-aboveabove-portrait-tabletlandscape-tablet-and-abovelandscape-tablet-and-medium-wide-browserportrait-tablet-and-belowlandscape-tablet-and-belowAppsNewslettersReuters PlusAdvertising GuidelinesCookiesTerms of UsePrivacyAll quotes delayed a minimum of 15 minutes. See here for a complete list of exchanges and delays.© 2017 Reuters. All Rights Reserved.



Suncor chops Syncrude production target after fire - The Globe and Mail























































































Jump to main navigationJump to main content




News Search
News









Login


Register





18 
Toronto





Subscribe
Help



AdChoices







Home»
Report on Business»
Industry News»
Energy & Resources




















Workers leave the Suncor oil sands extraction facility near Fort McMurray, Alberta. (MARK RALSTON/AFP/Getty Images)












Suncor chops Syncrude production target after fire
Add to ...




Jeff Lewis






CALGARY — The Globe and Mail


Published
Wednesday, Jul. 26, 2017 10:27PM EDT

Last updated
Thursday, Jul. 27, 2017 4:42AM EDT














 Comments



Share via email




Share on facebook




Share on twitter




Share on LinkedIn






 PrintLicense article











Suncor Energy Inc. is battling higher costs at its Syncrude oil sands project and said it would take longer than expected to restore production at the problem-plagued operation after a fire tore through the facility earlier this year.Calgary-based Suncor late on Wednesday maintained its production target for the year but chopped expected output at the bitumen mining and upgrading project by 3.5 per cent to a forecast range of 130,000 to 145,000 barrels per day.

The company also increased its budget by 10 per cent to a range of $5.4-billion to $5.6-billion, citing in part higher costs at the aging oil sands project.Production at the 350,000-barrel-per-day Syncrude project has been hampered for much of the year while the company works to repair damage from the March blaze. The company said it would return to normal operating rates by early August; it had previously targeted mid-July.Despite reductions at Syncrude, Suncor said overall output for the year would fall in the range of 680,000 to 720,000 barrels of oil equivalent per day, citing expected increases from its offshore operations.However, the company slashed its outlook for U.S. oil prices this year to $47 (U.S.) per barrel from $52 previously.The revisions come as the company reported net earnings for the three months ended June 30 of $435-million (Canadian) or 26 cents per share, versus a year-ago loss of $735-million or 46 cents.Following recent deals, the company is the largest owner of the Syncrude joint venture with a 54-per-cent stake. The other owners are Imperial Oil Ltd., Sinopec, CNOOC Ltd. and Mocal Energy.


Report Typo/Error

Follow Jeff Lewis on Twitter: @jeffalewis





 


SU-NSuncor Energy IncLatest Price$32.44+0.78(+2.45%)SU-TSuncor Energy IncLatest Price$40.36+0.59(+1.48%)Updated July 28 1:01 PM EDT. Delayed by at least 15 minutes.

More Related to this Story




OPINION
Wary investors may reward oil patch pessimism






Crude producers lock in financial hedges ahead of oil sands glut






Flow of Canadian oil patch deals slows to trickle in second quarter







Topics


Suncor Energy Inc.











Next story| Learn More

Discover content from The Globe and Mail that you might otherwise not have come across. Here we’ll provide you with fresh suggestions where we will continue to make even better ones as we get to know you better.







{{article_sprite}}

{{title}}
{{published_at}}


























Trending







{{title}}












Most popular videos »











 Report on Business


Inside the Market: The worst investment mistake you can make and how to avoid it








 News


Contraband cellphone video shows inmates' prison break








 Real Estate


Done Deals: This detached home sold for almost $550,000 over asking








 News


A breakdown of the moment John McCain voted against repealing Obamacare










 Sports


Michael Phelps races a CGI shark over 100 metres








 News


Trudeau kicks up his heels at Quebec county fair dance








 News


Watch McCain give a thumbs down on Obamacare repeal








 News


Opinion: Doug Saunders: Donald Trump's problems with pardons










 News


Protesters vow to 'take over Venezuela' ahead of Sunday vote








 Report on Business


Yield Hog: Five reasons to love dividends








 Life


The probiotic beer that could boost the immune system








 Technology


Meet Perdix, the drones that can swarm like insects







◀
●
●
●
▶








More from The Globe and Mail








 Globe Investor


WisdomTree boosts Canadian presence with Questrade ETF acquisition











 Arts


Review: Leslie Kean's Surviving Death and Adrian Owen's Into the Gray Zone explore human consciousness




















Most popular







Canada’s economy posts ‘blow out’ growth; dollar jumps








GOP blame-game begins after Senate failure to repeal Obamacare








Why you should use your Aeroplan points ASAP








China accuses Canadian-Chinese tycoon of major role in pyramid scheme








Bombardier breaks even; explores 'multiple options' for train unit




















Add to Watchlist




Add to Watchlist
















We've run into a glitch. Please try again later.






We've run into a glitch. Please try again later.

































News Releases - News Release - Suncor
























































 


Stock

Suncor Energy Inc., Stock Price


TSX:SU
$40.250
0.480


NYSE:SU
$32.360
0.700


20-minute delay

View stocks

























 







 




 

Home


Newsroom


News Releases




 

News Releases



 


 









Select Year


Select All
2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009





News Search










Suncor Energy reports second quarter 2017 results
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - July 26, 2017) - 
[Read release]


Suncor Energy declares dividend
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - July 26, 2017) - Suncor Energy's Board of Directors has approved a quarterly dividend of $0.32 per share on its common shares, payable September 25, 2017 to shareholders of record at the close of business on September 5, 2017.
[Read release]


Suncor Energy to release second quarter 2017 financial results
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - July 20, 2017) - Suncor will release its second quarter financial results on Wednesday, July 26, 2017 before 8:00 p.m. MT (10:00 p.m. ET).
[Read release]


Suncor Energy releases 2017 Report on Sustainability
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - July 13, 2017) - Suncor today released its 2017 Report on Sustainability which details the company's environmental, social and economic performance and its approach for continuing to deliver value in a carbon-constrained world. 
[Read release]


Suncor Energy provides update on Syncrude Mildred Lake Oil Sands facility
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - June 13, 2017) - Suncor today provided an update on the Syncrude Mildred Lake Oil Sands facility following the March 14 incident. 
[Read release]


Suncor Energy confirms restart of pipeline shipments from Syncrude Mildred Lake Oil Sands facility
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - May 1, 2017) - Suncor today announced that shipments from the Syncrude Mildred Lake Oil Sands facility have resumed following the March 14 incident. 
[Read release]


Suncor Energy reports voting results from Annual General Meeting
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - April 27, 2017) - Suncor held its Annual General Meeting in Calgary today. A total of approximately 1.2 billion shares (approximately 71.87% of outstanding common shares) were represented in person or by proxy.
[Read release]


Suncor Energy reports first quarter 2017 results
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - April 26, 2017) - 
[Read release]


Suncor Energy announces increased return to shareholders and early repayment of US $1.25 billion bond
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - April 26, 2017) - Suncor today announced plans to repurchase up to $2 billion of the company's shares over the next twelve months through a normal course issuer bid ("NCIB"), together with the early repayment of a US $1.25 billion bond. 
[Read release]


Suncor Energy declares dividend
CALGARY, ALBERTA--(Marketwired - April 26, 2017) - Suncor Energy's Board of Directors has approved a quarterly dividend of $0.32 per share on its common shares, payable June 26, 2017 to shareholders of record at the close of business on June 5, 2017.
[Read release]







 
Stay up-to-date with Suncor news with the click of a button.

Subscribe to Email Alerts 

 

Related links

See How We Support Canadian Athletes
Presentations
Webcasts & Key Dates
Suncor Energy YouTube Channel
Contact Us
Learn about our Social Media Channels
Suncor Energy Foundation
Canada's Ecofiscal Commission



















Suncor
























































 


Stock

Suncor Energy Inc., Stock Price


TSX:SU
$40.250
0.480


NYSE:SU
$32.360
0.700


20-minute delay

View stocks

























 









Shared energy future
Our 2017 Report on Sustainability is available
Read it now







Suncor Connections
Connecting with students through 
Junior Achievement on 
the East Coast

Read more







Together
we create energy for a better future
Visit together.suncor.com







SunCares
Our new program is now open
Learn more









 



 

Investor
Relations
Q2 Report
2017



Learn More

 



 

Sustainability
2017 Report on
Sustainability



Read More

 



 

Community
Investment
Funding priorities
Apply for funding



Apply Now

 



 

Suncor Careers 
& Jobs
Why choose us?
Meet our team



Search Jobs



 

Latest Suncor News


View all news releases
Visit Suncor Response Blog










Suncor News


July 26, 2017
 Suncor Energy reports second quarter 2017 results
Read More







 



Together
we connect


Follow along as we work to build a better future


Visit together.suncor.com  







 

Stay up-to-date with Suncor news with the click of a button


Subscribe to email alerts







 


Looking for something specific? Find a news release
Search news releases









        Pump Talk



            June 26, 2017
        

                A Blast from the Past at Petro-Canada

        
Read More











 


 



 

WE CREATE ENERGY FOR A BETTER WORLD
Suncor's vision is to be trusted stewards of valuable natural resources. Guided by our values, we will lead the way to deliver economic prosperity, improved social well-being and a healthy environment for today and tomorrow.
Read More



 



Suncor Brands, Products and Services


Petro-Canada



Petro-Points



Incentive Solutions



Wholesale














Suncor Jobs – Search Careers – Suncor
























































 


Stock

Suncor Energy Inc., Stock Price


TSX:SU
$40.250
0.480


NYSE:SU
$32.360
0.700


20-minute delay

View stocks

























 






 


Go ahead. Expect success.



 


Go ahead. Expect growth.




 

Home


Careers


Search Suncor Jobs




 

Search Suncor Jobs



 


 

Search by keyword
Use the search tool to find current job postings.



 


Keyword







Location








View All current jobs
 

Browse by location
See all jobs by location with our job map.











 














